Okay, I am feeling a little weird here....I actually like this place.....Let me tell you why. I go here for dim sum with my husband a few times a year.  We used to drive to San Francisco, but since we found this place we've been coming here.  As with most dim sum places if the food is on the cart for a while and depending how busy they are is does tend to cool off.  But for me most of the items were steamed and hot.  I have eaten a lot of dim sum (not quite an expert, but close) and this is good. Just as good as some of the higher priced ones in San Francisco. I think the service here is very good.  Anytime I have asked for anything that they have run out of on the carts or I haven't seen, they have gone and got it for me.That impresses me.  They are constantly filling water glasses and refilling soda. Now, the only negative is they don't smile. Quite Frankly I prefer not to have someone grinning at me while I am trying to eat, I would rather have them filling the carts and my drinks. Another plus is there is plenty of help, bus boys, waiters and cart ladies.  And everybody knows what they are doing and doing it well. So there you have it , I really like this place.  Bathrooms are very clean (big plus when I see this)  And we get in and out quickly.  Could use a little updating on the decor, and then I would have to say 5 stars..............
I don't understand why this restaurant has such a low overall rating!!!! HIGHLIGHTS: 1) Peking duck with the steamed buns: Usually, you have to order a whole duck but here, they do it dim sum style so it's a perfect portion! Crispy, fatty, and delicious!!!! 2) Honey Walnut Prawns: I've never seen this on dim sum carts anywhere until I came here!!!!!!!! This is one of my fave Chinese dishes so I was so excited to see it served as a dim sum item!!!! 3) We did not have to flag any carts down!!!! They came to us, which is a major plus!!!!!!!! 4) The decor of this place is very nice--elegant and semi-fancy, which is different from the usual dim sum places where fish tanks and carts to put dirty plates in are visible. DOWNSIDES: 1) It would suck to come here with a party of four because each dim sum item had 3 pieces!!!! Good thing we came as a trio!!! 2) Many of the dishes weren't piping hot when we got them!!! It's understandable that the carts do roll around to the other rooms, but many other places find ways to keep the food hot! 3) Didn't look like too much of a kid-friendly place! 4) More expensive than the typical dim sum restaurant. I WOULD DEFINITELY COME HERE AGAIN!!!
Came here for a Chinese wedding, what a surprise! *note sarcasm* We didn't get all the dishes that were suppose to be given, and we got slammed with 4 dishes at the very end all at the same time instead of having them all sparsed. Luckily we did get the lobster dish (the most important one), but for the most part it was aiite.
Maybe 10 years ago I was impressed with Ming's.  It was a bustling restaurant especially for Dim Sum.  In the past 10 years it has gone downhill.. fast.  Sad. Until I hear something good I will not be returning.
Wow, I think Ming's has seen busier days that's for dang sure. Vacant huge @$$ parking lot. Empty big @$$ restaurant. I arrived here this afternoon about 4:00 pm on a gift certificate I received and that is the only reason I had dinner here and I can tell you I won't be back again unless someone else is footin the bill. I ordered the chicken salad, which was very good. It was served in some sort of a fried thin bowl. Maybe fried wong tong wrap. I also ordered the mandarin beef...NEVER AGAIN! Hate to say it but I witnessed the older raunchy, blonde haired beyond middle aged woman waitress/bartender pouring herself a mixed cocktail on the job! She kept looking at me but I wasn't saying a thing...aint none of my business, but I do wonder if the Ming's are aware of this drinking alcoholic drinks on the job.......hummm? Diet Coke with lemon was good. Chicken salad was good. Mandarin beef totally sucked! Fortune cookie was good. Upon leaving I took a look at the pictures etc on display in the main entrance. I noticed a lot of pictures of the Ming's (I'm presuming) with various recognizable people such a MC Hammer, Robert Honda,and several other city/state politicians. I also notice a display diagram of the facility. Wow, Ming's is a huge @$$ restaurant.
The quality of the food here has gone way down in the past few years. We came here on an early Friday afternoon for dim sum. Everything was cold, cold, cold! The egg white rice we did order was good and warm though. The taste of the dim sum was actually alright but the coldness of all the items was a real turn off to everything. The service was good though. They also didn't turn on the AC and it was like 80 degrees that day with a full restaurant. Not cool. The service was fine and the environment was definitely classy for a dim sum restaurant. If they fixed the temperature of their restaurant and their food, this place would've easily gotten a 3. Yes, the coldness of the food was that distracting. Dim sum should not be served cold.
A great dim-sum restaurant in Palo Alto.  When we are in the peninsula Ming's has awesome dim-sum from 12 to 2pm.  Huge parking lot so parking is not a problem and very nice atmosphere inside.  They have carts always roaming around so you don't have to wait for anything.  Highly recommended restaurant, reminds me of Yang Sing in the City.
I was expecting more to be honest with you.  The food was good, but the service was horrendous.  It's almost as if the wait staff is trained to NOT look at you. The sweet and sour chicken with fried rice was quite tasty and very fresh, but the crunchy bowl the salad came in was rather tasteless, and nasty.  I had some thick noodles with soy sauce, scallions and sprouts from the dim sum cart and I thought they were rather good...not too salty. Not sure I will visit again primarily due to the service.  The wait staff does not smile and as I mentioned will not look at you so numerous times I had to wave my arms in the air to get them to notice me. and even then they moved slowly and seemed annoyed.
After a ten year absence, some friends took me to Ming's the other day. The old gal (Ming's that is) showed her age but some old style Asian class lived just under the patina. We had the won ton soup, kung pow, house chow mein and BBQ pork tenderloin. All were very good. I liked the chili condiment available at each table. A very good and unique recipe for those that like to numb the taste buds. The staff was professional and efficient. Definitely not their first rodeo. Prices were just about right for the venue. Ming's is an institution like Chef Chu's in Los Altos/Mtn View.  All said, Chef Chu's has the edge but Ming's was still very good and we will not wait ten years before returning for a another nice meal.
This is the 3 rd time I've had dim sum at ming's.  Each time, it was excellent. The service was prompt ( smiling waiter too).  The ladies with the carts came around quickly with steaming foods and were patient while we tried to decide what to eat. The owner,  Mrs. Vicky Ching is very friendly and walks around to greet the guests which is a nice touch.   the variety of dim sum was good too. I've had dinners there too and each time, the food was very good.  I like the spicy tofu. they now have happy hours which is always nice for a quick dinner.  ample parking too.
Ah, Ming's.  This is an eatery that says of its patrons: "I am in dire need of food, and Ming's serves food."
Love this place. I've been going here for some 10 odd years. I never go for dinner or order off the menu. I only eat the lunch time dim sum. I love choosing my food from the carts although some food is not as hot as a result. Go for dim sum, not for dinner. The restaurant gets pretty busy at about 12-1 on the weekends. As far as the other reviews, since it's a dim sum restaurant, you have to flag down the waiter (not wait).
Ming's is a Palo Alto institution. I love the Ming's Beef and I think the Dim Sum at lunch is lovely. I have always been served promptly and politely. Ming's is really an old school Chinese restaurant for this area. I like it but I can understand why it's not for everyone. There are so many Asian places in this area, I'm amazed so many stay in business. Ming's is a great place for business or something a little nicer then most.
Let me first start off by saying I go out to eat everyday. This is the FIRST RESTAURANT EVER I have given NO TIP. This place was beyond disgusting. We first get there and the clearly incompetent Asian workers ask us 3 times if we wanted dim sum and every time we responded, "no thank you, we will take a menu though". They looked pissed off when we told them this like they were offended we did not want dim sum. It looked grotesque by the way. So we get our menus 15 minutes later and order the sweet and sour chicken, generals chicken, and the green beans. My brother asks if he can get won ton soup in substitution of hot and sour. The woman refuses to do that and insists it cannot be done. On the menu it clearly states that for an additional $1 you can choose another soup. So we brush it off and wait for the food.... The hot and sour soup comes out and it is almost black, I thought weird but it might be good. It was disgusting. It was 85% gooshy things like soggy bamboo shoots and old mushrooms mixed with brittle tofu. There also seemed to be pieces of a mystery meat i honestly could not tell you what it was. So onto the entree. We get the sweet and sour chicken and the chicken salad on the same plate. Each piece of chicken is flat and rubbery. The meat was a darkish grey color almost like it was old dark meat. There was not a single piece of white meat on the plate. The Chinese chicken salad had pieces of chicken that had growths of black goo on them. I would have loved to vomit up this meal afterward but I believe it was too late. My brother got hit twice with a dim sum cart and my own waitress just walked into my chair at one point. This is the worst food I have had in over 5 years hands down. 2nd being the kfc I ate on de anza blvd that had a black goo pit in my snacker. Mings is the only other place I have been to that had this black goo on the chicken. Long story short, avoid this place at all costs, it is a health hazard. I also found out that there are high tension wires above this place that are known to cause cancer.....great news.
Have been going to this restaurant since I can remember and the place ranges from the very busy and bustling at times to very cozy even when there are very few patrons.  A great place to go for lunch on any day (and I believe they're still open seven days a week.)  People like me know when the service is slow and otherwise unattentive here, it's a sign the food is excellent.  An excellent take - out place, too, and I do not mind that the last couple of times I have been here, they have kindly (kind of) pushed me out the door with my menu items (bye, bye.)  Do not also forget the different and varied dishes and the gourmet mandarin style - this is a great place for varietal mandarin fare and of excellent quality - they even have some of their own very distinctive recipes.  Again, a great restaurant.
WoW, come on Yelpers your missing it on this one.  I've been a fan of Ming's since the late 80s and it never disappoints.  Cheaper food else, yes, faster service, maybe but...they wait on you hand and foot (if your not a jerk about "being in a hurry on a business lunch") and we ALWAYS leave stuffed and happy...for 25 years!!! Both Dim Sum and Full Menu are very good. Favorites: Ming's Beef, Chicken Salad, Duck, Shrimp noodles and dumplings (all of them ';-). ((note: probably more of a 4 star place but...have to help the score due to other Yelper's lacking score intellect around bar and take out or banquet experiences))
Found a fly in a dish. The manager said "Sorry but is nothing we can do about it. The flies just flew over." He offered 20% off as a settlement.  Also the waitress put fingers in the soup. We were totally disgusted. Hate to waste food but it's first time half of the foods were left on the table untouched.
I've only ever been here for banquet meals before, and it was pretty darn good. Their portion sizes are very generous. They're most well known for their "Chinese" chicken salad, which, let's admit, is not actually authentic Chinese food. The first time, I was lucky enough to be seated at a less than full banquet table so we had a profusion of food. All of their portions sizes are generous, but the taste is not that authentic and the prices are much higher than what you would pay in a more "Asian" area like Cupertino. I can see how this place is popular for business lunches though. Banquet service is efficient and prompt. I do find their knife and fork place setting a bit odd. But that, again, just speaks to the regular clientele that they serve.
Mings has been around forever...food is still pretty good.  Love their won ton soup.
By far the worst dining place I was unfortunate to try. Yelp should allow for negative stars, I think this place deserves about -100 of them. I ordered some onion pancakes, and guess what - there was a shard of ceramic in one of them. I took a bite and there went one of my teeth. I was in pain and obviously enraged, so I asked one of the ladies serving (who naturally spoke no English) to see the manager. The manager asked me if I was sure whether the shard came from their food (since perhaps people regularly come in restaurants with ready-made ceramic shards and chew on them). Then he made a phone call to his manager, and held on to the ceramic piece. I'm going to see the dentist soon, and will present them with the bill. I'll give them an extra star if they are decent enough to pay for it.
I am SERIOUSLY appalled that Ming's has such a low Yelp rating. There's something wrong with the world. Because Ming's is simply the best of the best when it comes to dim sum. My friends and I have been known to wake up, albeit hungover, at around 8 AM on weekends and talk about Ming's until it's an acceptable time to actually go to Ming's, eagerly anticipating their 11 AM opening (on weekends). A hidden gem off the 101 freeway in Palo Alto, Ming's knows what's up. There's just nothing more to it. I have not ONCE been disappointed by Ming's-- in taste nor service. Winnie and King are especially on their DS game. My favorites are the honey walnut prawns, some sort of balls with delicious stuff inside that my friends and I call "balls" and somehow the waiters magically know what we want (again, on their game), the pork buns, potstickers, chicken and chive dumplings, pan fried noodles...the list goes on and on. If you live anywhere in the area or are just searching for great dim sum in the Bay Area, make the trek. Go to Ming's. Make some memories. You will not be disappointed.
Good place to go for Dim Sum or Chow Fun. Great for a relaxed business meeting. Not sure why the low rating but did notice they are on an up trend. They have a full menu so you should be able to find something you like. People complaining they are expensive should check out their happy hour. Good prices.
A colleague/friend had a stomach ache and wanted some congee so we came here despite the bad reviews....probably a mistake...but the congee did the trick for her....the place was nice for a dim sum place and very spacious but the food was terrible.  Most of the plates we ordered seemed old and dry.....there are a lot more places that are much better.....will probably never go back here again....but thanks for the congee...
I don't know why this place has such a low rating. I've been coming here for years and have always left happy. Sure the service can be spotty, but then again, it's a dim-sum place, so you often have to flag down the waiters. The place gets pretty crowded during the lunch hour, so I suggest coming early, but not too early. If you get there before 11:30am, then they don't have a good selection of carts going around yet. I'd say that 11:45am is the perfect time to arrive. The food here is great and they offer a decent selection. I typically come with 1-2 other people, so we don't usually get to order too many dishes. I think dim-sum is best with a group of 4-8 people so you can order/try a variety of things. Just be aware that the price can add up, it normally comes out to about $20-30 each. I would definitely come back here and recommend the place to friends.
Used to be a nice restaurant.  The service was good.  The food was bad.  The price was expensive.  Most dim sum we had were cold.
This place is disgusting and filthy.  Food smells like it died years before it was served to you.  Yuck.  Save yourself, do not come here!
We had catered lunch so I can't say about the "actual" food here. From what I ate, I must say this place is um.... not that great?! For some reason the food were all cold when I ate them and the service was not good either. I would not come back again, unless someone else buys; in that case, I would need to reconsider...
This place is huge and terrible, food worst i have had in PA and the lowest form of what can be a superb cuisine...I have had to eat here for meetings 3 times, always very poor food (service is OK).
pleasantly surprised by this place.  also nice to see a dim sum place that has actual carts.  growing up in L.A., the carts were de rigeur at dim sum establishments, and I can't imagine dim sum without them. my chinese parents were visiting for a day.  i didnt know where to take them for lunch, and it was raining so my mom didn't want a cold salad (although she consented to go to Sprout for dinner).  Been wanting to check out Ming's for a while just to see how it measures up.  I wasn't even expecting dim sum, but that's what the had when we got there. Dim sum was really decent.  Much better than any of the hole in the wall places I went to in SF Chinatown a few weeks ago (I went on a dim sum tasting spree; my stomach was quite ill the following day).   The stuff wasn't as greasy as a lot of dim sum places are.  We sampled a few of the dishes.  They were pretty to good to quite good.  The lo mai gai was excellent.  Overall, a nice spot for a peninsula dim sum fix.
I actually really like the environment and the Dim Sum here...sue me. The restaurant is really spacious (they don't try to cram tables everywhere just to seat more customers), with tasteful decor, and very clean. Yeah the dumplings are small, but the skins are always firm, and the ingredients inside are flavorful. They also have sticky rice dumplings now! Chinese Donuts are hot, fresh and crispy. Spices and flavors in all the dishes are not too overpowering like they can sometimes get at other Chinese restaurants. I love the pork buns here (my favorite, sue me again). The buns don't have that weird plastic flavor, and the pork doesn't contain annoying food coloring. Not as much variety as some dim sum places in Chinatown have, but this ain't Chinatown. Basically I feel like everything here is fresh and good, and I don't mind the smaller quantities + slightly higher prices. And yes some of the dim sum dishes aren't hot, but obviously food doesn't stay hot after being out on carts rolling around the room.
**Dim sum review only** I've had dim sum here a couple times and have since looked elsewhere when my dim sum cravings kick in. A little more nicely decorated than other dim sum/Chinese restaurants.  Although I haven't tried their dinner menu, I'm thinking that's where they might shine, not dim sum. PRO: Spacious table and seat arrangement and atmosphere. CON: I've had better dim sum elsewhere and for cheaper too.
I've been here once for a graduation dinner and my parents really liked it. So this time around we went for the dim sum. I have mixed emotions about this place. I value the clean atmosphere, and I definitely see that their staff members are very well versed in customer service. For example, there were several times we requested a specific dish that we didn't see on the carts and the staff would run to the kitchen to inform for us. I like that there were carts of food during the entire time we were there (even at 1pm in the afternoon). The dim sum wasn't THE best I've had, but the price was definitely THE most I've paid for dim sum. For four people the total came out to be $94 before tips
We got lucky and found this place via Yelp for a large post graduation late lunch/early dinner.... Read more 
After a mediocre dining experience our last visit, we decided to give Ming's another try, a few years later and armed with a 10% discount encouraging patrons to return. I'll get the positives out of the way first: the parking lot is huge and space is plentiful.  The restaurant itself is very large as well and being seated promptly, even when they are busy, is rarely an issue. Service is very quick as well.  Tea is brought immediately to the table, although this time we were given the chance to choose another tea.  Dim sum carts, often waiting in the wings in the dining room, descend on you almost immediately as you are seated.  I'm gonna guess I could eat here, order, and be done in 10 minutes if I wanted. The crowd, while a good mix of Chinese and Caucasian, seems almost predominantly from the local area.  I'm pretty sure few drive far away to eat dim sum here as you often see at Hong Kong Saigon, Koi Palace, or ABC Seafood.  Also, this place continues to be pretty popular with wedding and banquet type events. Of course, it always comes back to the food, and while it was better than our last visit, the prices all make me think it worthwhile to drive a bit farther away (either North or South along the Peninsula).  Our selection: Har Gow or Shrimp Dumplings - a staple at every dim sum place.  Ours arrived lukewarm (a problem with the dim sum carts just standing in the dining room awaiting guests rather than turning over and returning to the kitchen).  There was a decent amount of shrimp but the dumpling was bland and sticky.  Mediocre. BBQ Pork Bun - better than our last visit.  Lukewarm and notable for the bun tasting similar to microwave bbq pork buns. Sticky rice wrapped in lotus leaf - Extremely bland and flavorless.  The sticky rice had some minced pork and nothing else.  No mushroom, no dried shrimp, and, most of all, no flavor. E-fu noodles with crab meat - this was the star dish of the day as well as the priciest ($11.95).  But had a decent amount of crab meat and mushrooms.  Good flavor and very piping hot from the kitchen. With our order of three small dim sum plates and the e-fu noodles are total bill was $30.  That's not cheap.  The e-fu noodles were probably the bargain of the bunch, but the dim sum plates were definitely not. Dim Sum King in Sunnyvale that only does take out dim sum is another level better than Ming's and a fraction of the price.  And I want even compare to some of the top dim sum places in the Bay Area. With a convenient location, a large and functional space, and quick service, the only weak link for Ming's is the food.  Unfortunately, that's a big one and they could easily hire the chef at Dim Sum King and see an immediate improvement.  Until I hear of such a move, I'll probably choose Taipan in the Palo Alto area or even go to Fu Lam Mum in Mountain View. Ming's does take credit cards, including American Express.
Ming's is a place that I've been to for weddings and was a popular spot when I was in college.... Read more 
Ming's has been in the Bay Area since 1956. The food is more of an Americanized Chinese, which makes sense since it is an older Bay Area dining establishment . It is pricer then a typical Chinese restaurant but it is also cleaner and has a nicer interior then a typical Chinese restaurant. They are a popular, Palo Alto location for events like wedding receptions or business gatherings since they can host for up to 500 people. The dishes Ming's is known for are, the Chinese Chicken Salad and the Lemon Chicken. However they offer some great vegetarian/vegan choices too, I am a fan of the vegan lettuce cups which are heavy with roasted pine nuts and smokey tofu. They also offer Dim Sum, which I have always skipped- it does not look very appealing here.
I had lunch here with a friend earlier this week. I wanted to try this place after an acquaintaince ranted and raved about it. I beg to differ. The dim sum is just ok. I have had better quality dim sum elsewhere. However, being the positive person I am, I did appreciate the excellent service. It made up for the unappetizing food. Sorry Ming's. Clearly, I probably won't be back.
Slightly more upscale dim sum. Very good, I liked the seaweed salad. We were lucky to get there as they opened, good service. Not the usual hurried service you get at some other places. You can actually have a conversation and hear each other.
Wow! I don't know how this place stays in business. When we walked into the dining area there were grains of rice everywhere on the floor. There was a weird funky smell too. We saw the waitress walk by and she was a complete mess, with hair and makeup all out of place. These awful conditions are what they restaurant is willing to show customers, I shudder to imagine what the kitchen looks like. We had to leave before we threw up. Stay away!
Ok dim sum and decent service but snotty hostess dampened the experience.  Won't be returning, don't recommend.
Our party of 4 had just finished attending the Quilt show at the San Mateo County Event Center.  It was a Friday afternoon, and the other couple wanted to go to Ming's as that is one of their favorite Chinese places. Ming's is just off the freeway 101 and there is plenty of parking.  But then we arrived about 2 PM.  It is a clean, modern, and large restaurant and had plenty of customers even after the normal lunch hour.  It is not a typical Chinese restaurant that many are use to with its filthy bathrooms, grimy floors ,and greasy tables. We were seated in a clean roundish booth.  The noise level was loud, but bearable.  Three of us decided to order their lunch special while the 4th person ordered Chinese chicken salad.  The lunch special consisted of the main dish, some Chinese chicken salad, a cup of hot and sour soup, and a scoop of fried rice.  The price was about $14 per order.  The on-line menu seems out of date. The service was excellent and the food was good, though a little bland. The chicken salad was not as greasy as from other Chinese restaurants. It is sort of a high end Chinese restaurant. The clientele had a more refined look and consisted of lots of well dressed business people. I'm not sure if I would come here again.  It is out of the way and a little pricey.
This is an old-school, large Chinese restaurant that's been open since 1956. That may sound impressive, and I guess it is, but the food isn't that good. I had a "spicy mixed vegetables" ($8.75) and a "cashew mock chicken soy gluten" ($9.00). I also got brown rice, and it was nice that it was on the menu, but they charge extra for it (I will never understand why Asian restaurants in the Bay Area all charge extra for rice, white or brown, when it's served free in other parts of the country). The food was mediocre at best. The spicy mixed vegetables was not spicy and was basically just bok choy and some broccoli in a light white sauce. The dish had little flavor and not enough variety of vegetables (some carrots, baby corn and mushrooms would have been nice additions). The cashew "chicken" was unimpressive. The chicken pieces were old-school re-hydrated TVP chunks, as opposed to more sophisticated mockmeats. The sauce was a brown, thick, corn-starchy abomination that got more gelatinous as time wore on. Oh, and vegans and vegetarians should ask questions about ingredients, as many of the dishes in the "vegetarian" section state clearly that they contain either ham, fish, chicken, or oyster sauce (and not the vegetarian versions). While I kind of liked the vibe in the restaurant (there's a cozy bar up front, some living room-esque rooms to the side, and lots of space in general), it's not a place I would return to.
I was forced to go here for a business function and was made to practically sit on a strangers lap. They have way too many tables and chairs crammed in the dining area. And the food, if you can get to it (since you are probably squeezed into some corner where you can barely move let alone awkwardly reach across the table for a greasy dough ball with mystery filling), is nothing special. Okay, okay, to be fair, I'm obviously not a fan of dim sum generally so my opinion of the food is probably tainted. Their string beans were good.
Great food! Seaweed salad-yum! Kung Pao chicken-wonderful Ming's beef-out of this world Honey Walnut Prawns-THE BEST I HAVE EVER HAD Chow Fun Beef-very good Service was very prompt. Food came out quickly. They cleared our dished away quickly. My only issue, it was on the pricey side. The decor could use a little sprucing up. But the food was some of the best.
The food here isn't fabulous, but I think they have the best wedding banquet food in the Bay Area. You can bargain hard here. Yes, don't be afraid to bargain. Expect them to come back, but push and give. You can get a great wedding banquet at the 3rd best menu. You don't need to pay the premium  with the best menu. Brides: you might complain about the low ceilings here, as it doesn't show up great in photographs. But the manager here knows what he is doing, an is quite accommodating. For regular meals I'd give a 3; for wedding banquets I give a 4.
Okay, again. Having said before that there isn't much culinary choice in the immediate area for lunch (I'm stuck there five days a week, and usually don't have time to make a lunch), it's kind of like your typical business-lunch Chinese food place. Tourist Chinese-food. So, if you're from Germany, you would probably Yelp this at no less than a four-star. If you're a hard-core dim sum/Chinese food enthusiast, I'd see you hesitating over highlighting that third Yelp star. I'm in the middle (don't do chicken feet, but love my dim sum). Lunch plates aren't bad. Since I have a Chinese uncle, I don't know if I'd ever take him here to eat, because although the waiters would probably fall all over him because he speaks their language, I can already hear him bitching about how there are only business-types here, and no "real" Chinese people, which really does tell you a lot about the food they serve. Having said that Uncle, it's East Palo Alto, technically. They really don't have a lot of Chinese people living close enough to find this place, let alone frequent it.
I normally do not give low ratings because I believe in supporting businesses - but I hope someone is reading this because I know Ming's can do better than this because I've had much, much better, even stellar food. The chicken salad, chow mein and most all the dim sum was tasteless except for the har gow. I ordered sea bass - which was grilled dry. You don't pay that much money for something like that to get what ended up like a bad fast food item. There's a glimpse as the ubiquitous broccoli beef and fried rice were flavorful.. Overall, I would not recommend the food.  Ambiance - very nice. Lots of parking and clean restrooms. But where is the pride in your food???? I am so disappointed in Ming's. Whenever I patronize you again, I hope that it will get better because I know it can be better.
Decent dim sum place, with LOTS of parking. Parking is so rare nowadays in Asian plazas, so that's worth mentioning isn't it? :) Came here with our company department for lunch and it was fancy shmancy! We got our own private room which was really nice for quietness and privacy and even our own private men/women bathroom. The restaurant apparently is reallyyy big and accommodates wedding parties all the time. Ok now the food. The food was decent, there were some varieties of dim sum I had never seen anywhere else before. For example, a deep fried shrimp egg roll, coconut/strawberry gelatin and egg gelatin. The dishes were tasty but I have to judge their dim sum on one particular one: my favorite-- xiao long bao (the soupy dumpling). Their's had no soup and there was too much filling. It didn't taste authentic. They do however make their own egg custard tarts!!! (Warm and delicious) which kind of makes up for their authenticity. I think Ming's is more for the atmosphere rather than straight up dim sum. The decor is wonderful, but I think the meal was pretty pricey for what it is.
For some reason, this place is my family's go-to restaurant for banquets and birthdays for the grandparents.  I don't know why.  It's pretty average...nothing spectacular.  Maybe that's why I always forget my experience there...because it's just so...mediocre and subpar. What I do remember is... - I asked a server for rice and he never came back with it. - I asked a server for some water and he said "OK OK LATER". - The fish was not well cleaned...hella scales. - The owners kept looking at us menacingly. - The servers kept tryna take food away from us when we weren't done! - The Peking Duck was actually pretty good...and so was the lobster with scallions.  I just didn't like how they didn't give us shell crackers....made it kinda hard to enjoy the lobster. With the amount of money that my family shelled out for this banquet, I'm VERY VERY VERY sure that we coulda went to another place which had better service and more memorable food.  My advice: Passsssss.
I would give this place 2.5 stars, but I chose 2 stars because the "Meh. I've experienced better" is closer to how I feel about this restaurant. This place definitely caters to a certain crowd (white businessy people and people who want to spend more than is required for dim sum [the two aren't mutually exclusive]) The sticky rice in the lotus leaf was good.  The XiaoLongBaos (shanghai dumplings) were nothing close to authentic.  The shrimp ChangFun (long rice noodles) was good.  The GaiLan was a little squishy Also the service could be better.  Even though there was many a staff member hanging around, we had to flag them down from across the room repeatedly to ask for something. I like the decor of the inside, however.  Well done, interior decorator.
It's actually surprising how this place is only rated 2-1/2 stars from reviews. My dining experience here last night was exceptional. I was invited to my friend's holiday dinner party, and we had the private room and served with a set dinner. And for the record, this was the only set dinner, in which I actually tried every single course and liked everything. Starters: *Combo Platter: Consisted of seaweed, jellyfish, and thin slices of beef, pork and chicken. - really light. the seaweed tasted good. and the meats were definitely tasty. *Fried Quail: presented on a platter with each piece of whole quail. definitely tasty...however, since it's really unusual for me to eat quail..(having a friend who's sitted beside you and gives you a guilt trip of eating a small bird doesnt help either); i ended up more of trying it, than savouring it to pieces. *Chicken and Squid with Snow Peas: Loved how the snow peas were cooked just right; with a crunch to it. nothing really spectacular with this dish. i had to add a bit of soysauce and chili sauce to appreciate it. *Egg Drop Soup: without soy sauce and chili, it was pretty bland. Entrees: *Honey Walnut Prawns: Yuuum! Not too sweet and rich which is really good. Loved how they are very generous with the amount of walnut they top on this dish. *Ginger and Scallion Crab: Huuuuuuge!!! 2 pieces of Dungeness crab shared by 9 people still gave us some leftover. We got it down and dirty, crackin like a savage. In all fairness, the shell was pre-cracked...so we didn't really have to use the crackers that much. *Steamed Whole Sole: This is really gooood. Fresh Catch it seems like. Just melts in your mouth..This is one of my faves last night. *Mushrooms with Bokchoy: Although really tasty, i'd rather have them use shitake mushrooms than the fresh mushrooms. *House Fried Rice: so good! and loaded with shrimp. As for dessert: Didn't have room for any...so i didn't even bother trying. The service was good. We didn't really have to ask for anything as he's always there refilling our glasses. as for the mixed drinks. The Lemon drop was really strong. I had to stop after 1 glass... Location wise: really easy to find. It's right off of the Embarcadero exit. A lot of parking too.
Yumm, good food, not the best, but still good...
*whoops! I had this posted to the wrong Mings (for almost 2 years before someone called me out* This is an over priced cater to non-Chinese Chinese Restaurant. I had dim sum here and this is by far the worst dim sum I've had. Shumai was hard and with no shrimp, the sticky rice wrapped in tea leaves was just rice no sticky, and we tried some weird shrimp ball covered in canned corn kernals...ew..it just looks like it makes you want to puke.  I believe they are still in business because the decor is nice, the location is superb, and they have a large business lunch crowd (full of non-Chinese people forcing their Chinese business partners to endure this food in order to make a business deal). Now I understand why I have grown up Chinese on the Peninsula in a family who eats out 4 or more times a week and has NEVER come here with my parents - they know whats up. Anyone craving authentic Chinese food, steer clear of Mings, you are in the Bay Area, let alone the Peninsula, we are the capital for authentic or even good non-authentic Chinese food.
Came here for dim sum and this place was mediocre at best.  Food tasted bland and old - everything was basically lukewarm.  The only thing hot was the tea.  To be frank, dim sum didn't even taste like authentic dim sum here.  It was definitely pricier than other dim sum places, too.  And service was sucky - we literally waited about 15+ minutes for them to bring back our change! I'm not even sure why this place is as busy as it is.  Maybe this is the only dim sum option in the Palo Alto area? I don't know, but I'm baffled...how can this place charge so much for such sucky food?
Service: This was dim sum, so service is a trolley. Service was fast to bring hot tea and water. I also like the fact that they already had a fork and knife on the table (good dim sum can be slippery, and occasionally you need a fork and knife). Food: Dumplings: Great fillings, but the noodles were a little sticky. Chicken feet: One of my favorites, were tender and had bits of chili flakes, in a glutinous savory sauce. Tofu wrapped chicken: Another savory dish, with cooked chicken, tofu wrapped in a rich sauce. Shrimp in noodle rolls, had a sweet flavor, and with the fresh shrimp, were tender and tasty. Note: Great sauces on the side. Other comments: I am surprised at the low ratings. This was one of the better dim sum meals. The place was clean and the service was polite and prompt. I would definitely go back.
If you're familiar with my reviews you might know that I have a penchant for soliloquizing about Koreans or Koreaness or things Korean, and while some might label certain commentaries as questionably reinforcing stereotypes, I say, are you serious?  I have black hair, brown eyes, I was raised on rice and when my Caucasian friends came over after school for snacks, it wasn't for milk and cookies (ha! fools, we're lactose intolerant!) but jujubahs and kimbap.  What am I supposed to write about, mac & cheese?  I don't know the first thing about it except that it comes in a box.  Therefore, I write about what I know, about my unique experience and observations as a Korean American:  level 3 chopsticking, garlic and a ticket to the spicy life I am still freaking waiting to get on board.   I love it that you and I are different, or the same?  Carry on! So after that aimless sermon touching on Korean stereotypes, of course I'm going to review a Chinese restaurant.  Typical! Ming's is a popular choice for brides and grooms.  I've had a handful of friends hold their receptions here over the years -- some good, some bad.  The food quality hasn't always been consistent, but the staff is always 100% respectful. True Story:  I once attended a predominantly Korean reception held here and if there's one thing I love it's a hilariously tacky group of old school Korean people.  Take, for example, lovely and uber stylish autumn bride who, for her wedding, chose stunning glass hurricane vases filled with fresh fall nuts and fruits (persimmons, apples, tangerines, chestnuts, walnuts, cranberries, etc.) accented with a handsome grosgrain ribbon as the centerpieces, instead of flower arrangements. You know where this is going? Fifteen minutes into cocktail hour, I mean, the bridal party hasn't even arrived yet, the banquet coordinator at Ming's runs mid cardiac arrest to me at the receiving table to report a certain abuse of decorations.  We basically had a cavalry of gray haired forty and fifty-somethings on our hands busting out their Swiss Army knives, manhandling, peeling, attacking fruit (and the nuts!) like they had just been released from Survivor Island.  Half in stitches, half horrified, I surveyed the room.  It was too late.  Scraps on the table, the Koreans had left no survivors.  So may this be a lesson for all you brides-to-be:  if you're going to invite Korean people, a.) best be sure you you don't have edible centerpieces, and b.) have guests check all weapons and metal objects at the door.
After a good number of visits to Mings (at least five dim sums and two dinner banquets), I can safely conclude that we're not too crazy about dining here. DIM SUM offers a variety of dishes, and most of our staple items (e.g., steamed dumplings - mostly seafood, rice wrapped in lotus leaf, chinese broccoli, jook...you name it) have been decent in taste...just not memorable at all. Our typical highlight may well be the heart-shaped mango pudding. However, we've been more disappointed wth the two full-course DINNER BANQUETS. Greasy and not  exactly seasoned to our satisfaction, the food simply did not impress. SERVICE has been mostly horrendous, so this is where I'm deducting another star. The ladies pushing the dim sum carts have often been quite unfriendly to us. Moreover, it was difficult to grab anyone's attention during the last dinner banquet. We had to walk over to anyone in sight to simply get water. AMBIANCE and LOCATION are probably the two things that kept us going back to this restaurant. The place is huge and offers a decent setting that's suitable for numerous occasions, including corporate functions and wedding receptions. It's conveniently located right off 101 in Palo Alto, and there aren't many dim sum places in this neighborhood. SUM: Certainly there are much better Chinese restaurants in this area. I just need to find them!
When I was a kid, I used to spend about 12 hours a day making a little white dot go back and forth on a 13 inch black and white tv. I was NUTS for that game. I would dream about it all day at school, race home, pig out on funions, pop in my top loading VCR to record Fraggle Rock, and ensure that my future self would have carpal tunnel syndrome. Looking back at the game of pong, while good at the time, is a total hunk of shit now. This is how I justify to myself how people actually like Mings. They just don't know any better. They haven't been exposed to anything beyond the dry, bland dumplings. They haven't seen the light of something new. People, for the love of all that is holy about dim sum, please, do yourselves a favor. Drive to Cupertino. Commute.
The 4 stars is for my overall experience with having our wedding reception here, not for the food. We booked our reception here because compared to May Flower, Joy Luck Place, and ABC Seafood, Ming's prices were better, their building looked nicer, they had a lot more parking available, and they were closer to our ceremony location. They say the large room holds 150-300 people, but if you want to keep the dance floor open, 220 is already tight. I was very satisfied with the customer service: they were always friendly and helpful when I called and showed up in person to ask questions and confirm details, and they were very accommodating with menu changes. And they'd actually give me suggestions on how to save money (e.g. by bringing in my own alcohol and appetizers instead of buying from them). Unfortunately, the food was disappointing. Out of the 5 dishes my husband and I ordered for our sweetheart table, I only enjoyed the honey walnut prawns. I was impressed by our waiter though. A few guests I talked to afterward said the food was fine, and a few others said it was really good. I do like their Chinese Chicken Salad, even if it's not really Chinese because salad is not real Chinese food.
Sunday: dim sum brunch with a dozen friends and relatives with vastly varying degrees of Asian-ness. Ming's is perfect. Clean -- ten times cleaner and nicer looking than the typical Cantonese venue. Yes, Koi Palace has much better food -- but it's also filthy, and we didn't feel like waiting an hour in the rain for a table. Of the food, everything seemed as good as previous visits, except the multiple orders of Shanghai dumplings (xiao long bao), which were unanimously disappointing. Too much meat, way too much cabbage, oversteamed and broken skin. Embarrassments that should not have been concocted, let alone served. Maybe it's a Taiwanese variant, but it's not what people expect when they order XLB. Their stuffed bean curd wrappers had too much bamboo shoots -- unsettling to those leaning toward the "chicken fried rice" side of the Asian scale. (I thought they were nummy...) The steamed barbecue pork buns (char siu bao) were a hit -- not as sugary sweet as most places, and a bit on the petite side. Make sure to flag down a floor manager and special order their scallion pancakes and the steamed pork buns -- you'll get them piping hot from the kitchen. Ultimately the goal of a weekend brunch with a large group of people isn't to feed them. Food is peripheral. If you stick to your guns and give people "the best, mostest authenticist ethnic food," sacrificing other things such as parking, cleanliness, price, and/or elbow room, you're going to have a number of disgruntled guests. Ming's takes the middle road. Nothing offends. It will leave most everyone happy. Dim sum for twelve with some food left over: $10 a head. Not bad at all.
(This review is only in regards to their dim sum.) One of my fav places for dim sum, and definitely... Read more 
Ahhh... Ming's, where do I start? I came here once and I don't think I'll ever go back again. I got food poisoning from eating their roasted quail and I remember specifically how it all happened. I was here at this restaurant for a social dinner and when I bit into my quail, I tasted something soft and chewy that was NOT suppose to be soft and chewy if cooked right. Anyway, I told the waiter that I thought my quail was bad but he insisted that it was suppose to be that way. Boy was he wrong. I barfed and pooped until the wee hours of the morn' that night and never got a single ounce of sleep. I was sick for 3 days after that. Never again! "It's suppose to be that way", my butt!
After almost a year away, we've hit Ming's twice in the past two weeks: once for Dim Sum and once for take-out dinner. The take out wasn't cheap, but it was tasty, fast and friendly.  More importantly, they were very understanding and accommodating of our allergy needs (egg in particular can be a real challenge at Chinese restaurants)... preparing things carefully and then double checking with the kitchen when I arrived. I also find that it's tough to go wrong with the Dim Sum... and again the last time found them helpful sussing out our allergy concerns. Will be back again soon.
I like Ming's.  They serve a wide variety of dim sum daily and also offer menu service at... Read more 
Fine, not really spectacular, although they still had quite the variety even at the late hour of 2p.  In addition to the standards, we got shrimp coated in corn kernels (which looked kinda gross, and the corn was pretty bland, but otherwise wasn't bad).  I also saw a dessert that looked like Peeps...very cute. Actually, you know what, Ming's is definitely not as tasty as other dim sum places around the Bay...and it's expensive (so Palo Alto).  Make the trek up to San Mateo, or for cheap and good, King Wah in Daly City.
Well, I warned my parents this place was getting a sour New Year's Yelp! A couple years ago we had a 100+ person family banquet at Ming's. (Chinese families love to have big banquets!) Given the mediocre experience they provided for that occasion, I had a strong feeling that last night would not prove to be much better. To kick off the Year of the Tiger, they had a "special" Chinese New Year's celebration for their customers. Twice during dinner a really cute youth Lion Dance troupe performed throughout the restaurant complete with drums beating and brightly lit eyes that teased the crowd. I really did enjoy this part of the evening, but... The absence of a special New Year's menu and horribly nonexistent, rude service (except when the bill was ready) brought us to half-hearted laughter about how bad it really was! We began the evening being seated, but without menus for 15 minutes. Our waitress seemed to have an issue with making eye contact as she avoided looking at us and when she caught our eye would run the other direction! At one point after our dishes were practically tossed on the table, we asked what the sauce was. She mumbled "I dunno, some kind of vinegar thing." Top that with a dish that was 3/4 onions and 1/4 over cooked scallops, this was definitely a bitter melon moment! I guess I will have to get my New Year's fix another place where the long life noodles, lettuce cups and full stem mandarin oranges are aplenty. Gung Hay Fat Choy to my fellow Yelpers!
When the hubby and I moved to the Peninsula and were looking for a good, authentic Chinese restaurant, soooo many people at Stanford recommended this place, we figured it had to be good (despite the gaudy fake-Chinese exterior). The food was mediocre.  Dim sum was warm, not hot.  Har Gaw were rubbery on top and the bottoms had disentegrated into puddles of white goo; the fillings were bland and had a starchy texture.  Their "signature" meat dish was a joke- deep friend pieces of pork in a generic sweet sauce served over a bed of stale white fried rice noodle.  The vegetables were overcooked and soggy.  The fish was not fresh. The food would have earned 2 stars, but the service we received was so bad, even for a Chinese restaurant, I had to knock one star off.  And this isn't even one of those Chinese restaurants with amazing food and crappy service that caters to Chinese people who don't care about service. Our waiter was SUPER rude from the minute he came to ask for our drink order (hot tea only).  Didn't smile once, kept rolling his eyes. And get this: when I asked if he had a favorite dish to recommend, replied "How should I know what you want?  What I like doesn't matter to you. Just order!"  I kid you not. He actually THREW one of our dishes onto the table so hard, I thought it was going to slide off onto my lap.  And (no shock) we didn't see him again until 45 minutes later when he finally brought our check.
I've only tried their Peking duck which wasn't bad. I'm sure its not the best out there, but nevertheless, they're deserving of a haiku... greasy Peking duck wrapped in my hand with hoisin double happiness
MIng's is just about what you would expect from a Chinese restaurant which is named after one of the most famous Chinese imperial dynasties which is located in a wealthy, predominantly white suburb. I was actually kinda surprised (and disappointed) when I first walked in here that they didn't play a gong every time someone entered. That would've been worth an extra star there. The dim sum is ok if unremarkable. They sure have a LOT of fried shrimp based dim sum. I love fried shrimp as much as the next fried shrimp lover, but I feel weird being able to express that love in public. Cart service is not extremely prompt. I get the feeling that because they are not in the pressure room type environment you find at your typical hardcore HK dimsum lounge, they are little more lackadaisical and are used to having to answer questions of, "What's that?" and "What's in there?" from all the gwai loh. If you like dimsum and you know what you are doing, don't waste your time with this place. Instead drive immediately to Fook Yuen or Koi Palace, or if you are south of Palo Alto go to Cupertino Village or Ranch Plaza and hit up one of the many excellent establishments there. I'm assuming that if you live in the city or East Bay you wouldn't even dream of coming here. If on the other hand you are a peninsula dweller who wants a nice, unchallenging and safe suburban introduction to dim sum, walk through the imperial gate and hear resounding note of a gong (in your mind). The emperor has arrived.
The place is clean and the service is good....two things that I'm not use to when getting dim sum.  It confused me.  Nothing about the food stuck out as being amazing beyond noticing that the food wasn't as greasy as I'm use to. Go or don't.  The World will continue to spin.
I've been here once for dim sum and a few regular items like fried rice and roasted duck. It was OK  - a friend treated us out and it was pretty expensive for chinese food. Service was rude. Overpriced and offensive.
I didn't go inside, so I can't comment on the ambience, but from the outside, it is one helluva fancy building.  I can see why many receptions have been held here.... and the parking lot is huge, location is conveniently right next to the freeway. The food - - I only had 3 things.  The Pork Siu-Mai, the Shrimp Dumplings, and the Scallop/Chive Dumplings. Those are the staples I try at any dim sum place, and since this was just a snack - -  those were what we settled for.   In that order - the pork was good in taste but a bit too hard in texture, the shrimp was tasty but needed better seasoning and more filling inside the dumpling, and the last one was unidentifiable but perhaps appealing and tasty only to the bovine class of living creatures with four stomachs and habits of regurgitation.  I didn't see or taste scallop anywhere amidst that green, grassy mess inside the dumpling.... With dim sum, though - I am not looking for ambience.  I want good food, period... at good cost.  Mings, while fancy, offers me mediocre food and based on other reviews, I take it that it's costly too.  Not my cup o' tea..... If I wanted expensive dim sum but excellent taste, I'd go to Yank Sing again after refinancing the house to do so.
Two stars for the food, served during dinner at two wedding banquets. One was sometime in 1997/98, and the other was sometime 2000/2001. This place is huge, convenient as it is right off the freeway, so even out of town guests, unless they're dyslexic or dysnfunctional (or both) should not have problems finding the place, let alone ample parking in their huge lot. But this is where the convenience ends, which is a compromise over the food. Ming's is arguably also a historic landmark, since it has been around for such a long time. So yep, classic case of diluted/dumbed down a bit of Chinese food, stuck in time, and not changing a whole lot. Perhaps dim sum here is better, since most Chinese restaurants take a huge nosedive and the food and experience suffers at wedding banquets. As you know most Asian wedding banquets (the people that is) tend to be fashionably late, so if you are attending one, stuff some mortadella sandwiches in your jacket pocket, cheez wiz cracker lunchables, maybe an Arby's mini, just to keep that hunger at bay, because you have to sit through all those long winded speeches and family introductions before you get to eat the food. And it's even a worse experience that when you start wolfing down the food, it's either lukewarm or borderline room temperature, and your brain is telling you something is wrong, but your brain cels are starved so they don't care (and any consequences that might follow). We met the owners (or managers?) of Ming's (a middle aged Chinese/Mandarin speaking couple) one time during Wednesday dinner, waiting in line outside Happy Cafe in San Mateo. Turns out they are huge fans of this hole in the wall and also like us would only order from the FOB only menu (aka white board specials, the authentic xiao chir or small plates). This was 2 to 3 years ago. They happily mentioned that whenever they can they would come here each week (which is when HC would open for dinner on Wednesdays.) Goes to show that even the owners don't do dinner at their beloved Ming's, and prefer to eat some nitty gritty greasy down home comfort food at a hole in the wall 20 to 30 mins drive north. What does that tell you?
This is one of the worst culinary experience I've had in a while if you can even call it that. It seems like the dishes were heated up from a cold state and were not fresh. I was afraid I might get a stomach ache from some of the dishes as well. In particular the "Haw Gao" and "Siew Mai" were both kinda hard and cold. You will come here if you don't know what you're talking about and don't care about the quality of your dim sum. You will come here if you have a terrible taste in Chinese food but perhaps you live next door so you like the convenience.
Came here recently for a wedding banquet so this review is based on the special-menu dinner. I'm surprised at the 2.5 star overall rating also but perhaps the banquet set is better the regular menu food? First - the Good: 1. CLEAN bathrooms (regret to admit this is a rare thing for many Chinese restaurants; not exactly sure why this is!) 2. Easy access off Hwy 101 and plenty of parking in their lot (for those coming from out of town) 3. Best banquet items: cold plate appetizers (interesting combination), crisped chicken (meaty & juicy), the lobster (large and cooked perfectly), stir-fried beef (so tender and flavorful!), scallops & shrimp (large and fresh), Peking duck (skin done right). 4. Great waiter/server and he had such a playful sense of humor! 5. Real and soft cotton cloth napkins! (not those polyester ones that don't absorb water or dab very well) Okay, now the Not-so-Good: 1. Steamed fish was bland and overcooked. Also, the shark-fin soup these days don't really have much shark fin in it -- and I would have been happy with a different type of hearty soup instead. The service and food quality with fair pricing are major  considerations when I rate restaurants. I'd come back here for a special party again.
Ditto Candace P.  Went yesterday with Peter H and our families.  The kids had fun terrorizing the place, but the food was sub par.  The luo bo gao was just horrific - one bite was it.  The noodles were OK, and the various dumplings were just bland and boring.  We ordered $120+ worth of food (hey, we had *9* people), and the best three things were: (1) the conversation, (2) the diet coke, and (3) the custard buns. As always with bad dim sum, I had the multi-hour suffering of heartburn and MSG hangover afterwards.  It almost put a crimp into our ridiculously delicious dinner party we threw that evening - but I managed to muddle through the great food and great wine with style.
This review is for the banquet service only.  I honestly don't frequent Ming's for dinner... mainly because of the prices. First, let me say that me and my wife are both Chinese. We recently had our wedding reception dinner here.  The food was great, but most importantly, the service and planning was awesome.  Sophie was our contact there.  They were more than accomodating, allowing us to bring our own wine and beer.  They chilled our white wine and beer the night before.  Set-up for the AV equipment and receiving tables, take-down... it was all so easy with the staff.  One of the only Chinese restaurants where the staff are all universally gracious, helpful, smiling, and willing to go the extra mile. There are lots of great Chinese restaurants for banquets in the area.  The food here is good, though not the best we've ever had... but for a large banquet, it's the ambience and appearace of the place that counts.  The food is way above average. Ming's banquet room is beautiful (the most aesthetically pleasing we found in the area) and the service unparalleled. With all the options in the area, I'd go back to Ming's for a large banquet without hesitation.  We got the 50/pp banquet menu.  The lobster, steamed bass, shark fin soup, and duck were top notch. Ask for Sophie... we had two receptions... one on the mainland and one in HI.  This was our second, and Sophie made it easy for us.  Very helpful, very accomodating... seriously... try to find a large Chinese banquet hall on the peninsula that you can honestly call helpful and accomodating...  Thanks, Ming's!  This is hands-down the nicest staff I've ever seen in a Chinese Restaurant.  Just look at all the smiles on the wait staff, busboys, hosts/hostesses. Overall four stars on the banquet menu we ordered.  5 stars on the service and ambience... for a wedding reception, i'd say the latter is more important, and I'd give the overall experience 5 stars!  If you're looking for a wedding reception venue, you can't go wrong with Ming's!
Alright, lets make this simple and useful. this place deserves 3 stars; 1 star for all the cute mulan looking servers 1 star for the decor 1 star for how big it is thats it.  The food taste like american made dim sum, you know how Costco sale those Ling Ling's potstickers? Thats what it taste like.  Im not saying Ling Ling taste bad, but i wouldn't pay a lot of money to eat it. Nuff said.
I had the opportunity to go to this restaurant last night with some people who were visiting from an office we have in Taiwan. I was joking around with them and asked them if we can go to " Chevys" instead! They liked that. The most amazing thing was that they actually knew what Chevys was, as this was their first time to USA. We arrived there at 6:30pm and I was figuring I would take over and order the food etc.etc. Well my Mandarin speaking skills are pretty limited, so I sat back and the waiter and the other 6 of us just watched in amazement as these guys knew exactly what to order for all of us in their native Mandarin. First up, Mings Chicken Salad, without question one of the better ones I have had. Not too salty, not too overly oily and great slices of Chicken. Next up, Hot and Sour Wonton soup, just had a little bit too much spice for my liking as I am kind of a wimp in that respect. The main course(s) they ordered were Bangkok Curry fried rice, Szechaun Prawns, Broiled Garlic Lobster, Filet of Cod w/Chinese Green and my personal choice, the Steamed Black Cod Filet. All of the above dishes were cooked to perfection and left me with a sense of what it must be like to be pampered in life you know? For dessert we all had Mango Pudding topped off by Mings Green Tea. Great restaurant, definetly will be back.
At Mings, giving the waiter your order is a wasted effort at Mings.  Don't go here..... ever. We are new to the neighborhood, and a group of 9 of us decided to give Mings a shot for lunch.  Here are some high lights... 1) Had to ask for menus 3 times... 2) The waiter acknowledged my co-workers order for an ala carte portion, but still served the full entree portion. 3) Waiter tried to switch a smaller bowl of soup (from the above mistake) for a full size order of soup from another co-worker, as he realized the mistake.  He claimed the portions were 'similar', but when we insisted he bring the full bowl, it was clearly twice as large. 4) Waiter did not check on table, one coworker waited 35 mins for his entree, and we had to remind the waiter to look for it. 5) Waiter refused to split the bill on multiple credit cards. 6) After this poor service, still had the balls to add an 18% gratuity. 7) Oh yeah, and the food was sub average quality. 8) Oh yeah, even worse it was expensive.
Dim sum nirvana exists at the edge of a business park en route to the Palo Alto Airport.  Ming's offers diners an elegant, affordable dim sum lunch experience that will send you back to work satiated and feeling like you got a pretty good deal. The food is tasty --- I highly recommend the BBQ Pork buns,  the mushrooms stuffed with chicken,  the beef meatballs, the chicken and vegetable shu mai and the shrimp dumplings with corn.  Continuous  carts heaped with dim sum are wheeled around the restaurant allowing patrons to weigh their options and make selections.  It is tough to choose because there are a lot of delicious considerations!! The staff is friendly and attentive.  The atmosphere is elegant and the price is decent.  This was the first time in a while I felt like I got what I paid for and then some from my lunch experience.  I'll definitely Dim Sum at Ming's again!
Ehhh I've had better. I've never gone to Ming's on my own accord. Everytime I've been here is when my family has had guests to entertain. We usually order the giant party meal that comes with many items (serves 10 people): 1. Peking duck - I'm always a fan of this delicious dish, HOWEVER during my most recent visit they served mostly duck skin. At most, 1/4 of the dish came with meat, not just the skin. 2. Soup - The one with shrimp and scallops is very good. 3. Fried rice - Decent flavor, somewhat greasy 4. Catfish - Tender, perfect flavor 5. Fried tofu - Delicious! 6. Red bean dessert - I love this dessert. It isn't very sweet and that's what I like about it. There were a few other items I didn't try: crab, a cold dish with squid and some veggies, and some others that escape my memory. The food here is not amazing and because of this it seems overpriced.  The party meal deal I mentioned above was somewhere around $250-$300 before tax so that's about $30/person.  I'm not sure what prices are like for smaller dining parties, but I wouldn't take someone here for that price when there are much better eats nearby. This place just seems to be a family favorite since it's down the street from where we live, service is good, and the interior doesn't look too bad - standard Chinese restaurant.  Standard = Chinese decorations, white tableclothes, uncomfortable wooden seating, and lazy Susan.
If you have any Asian soul in you, you will know that this place is lacking something. Yeah, the decor is nice, the service is decent, they are never really crowded, but the food is simply uninspiring and sometimes even bland. Their forte seem to be catering to the business around there. They seemed to have stagnated while everything got better around them. Maybe they need a makeover.
I've been here twice and neither time was a good experience. It was awkwardly empty both times. Food is fine--nothing spectacular. Dim sum special for dinner was rather bad actually. Last time I went I was situated in a room with an unbearable ringing noise. I don't think I will be coming here again other than by force.
Food = good quality, moderate to small portions. We had the crispy chicken salad (very americanized); hong kong pan fried combination noodles (average); mongolian beef (skip it, spicy but boring); steamed whole fish (delicious and tender); black bean prawns; peking duck (below average, the buns are very much not real buns..damnit); crispy chicken (delicious tender juicy chicken with crispy skin *drool*); garlic peashoots (delicious but it's hard to screw up).  Oh and ftw, tons of brown rice! Service = efficient, if at times, a bit pushy. Decor = simple, elegant, and clean. Parking = have their own lot, so enjoy.
All of the food that I had was awesome! However, I have to warn that I went here for my friend's wedding reception so all of the food was also taken care of by the beautiful couple. My favorite was the shrimp stuffed crab (or was it crab stuffed shrimp?) Either way, yummy! The place is really easy to find and it has cute decor so it's definitely a good option for a reception/party.
Have enjoyed multiple work dim sum lunches here.  It's quick, the servers understand you and are not rude like at your really good "authentic" dim sum places.  Sure it's not the best dim sum in the world, but it's tasty and I've never been sick from it. There's lots of parking and prices are average for the area.
2 of 5 stars fo Ming's of Palo Alto. I was first introduced to Ming's about 20 years ago. At that time, it was high-end authentic Chinese food. It was pricey, crowded and the food was amazing. Well, that was 20 years ago. Its been at least 10 years since I visited Mings and it has changed. Having a visiting Japanese customer meeting in Menlo Park, Ming's seemed a good choice when they suggested Chinese food. It was a cold and rainy Monday night in early December around 6pm. Upon entry to the Restaurant, I noticed an upright piano stored in the lobby area and the entire bar area seemed like closed for cleaning (tables and chairs piled-up). Not a very nice visual to welcome guests. Promptly escorted to our table I noticed the dining room hadn't changed much. It was clean but looked "well-lived-in". We ordered a wide selection of food which seemed "typical Chinese" to me. While everything we ordered was good tasting and enjoyable with no complaints. It just seemed like "typical food", nothing special to command the higher prices. Frankly, I can think of several other Chinese places with food at least as good at more reasonable prices. So, it was a good experience without any problems or issues. Would I go back? Yes, but, I know several other Chinese places that I'd prefer.
Gross. Yucky. The chicken in General's Chicken is completely unidentifiable other than a distinct "chewy" texture. Again, Gross. Yucky.
Ming's is the best place for dim sum and large family dinners in Palo Alto.  I'm never disappointed with the food when I come here.  My favorites are the roast duck and walnut prawns. A tip for those going to Ming's for a banquet--they like to bring their dishes out one at a time, not sure why, but per a friend of mine, the "fancier" places like to pace their dishes like that.  I was ravenous the last time I was there but it was fine in the end because all the dishes were worth the wait.
The food here was subpar and unmemorable. The wrappers for the dimsum dumplings were mushy and the shrimp seemed past its freshness date. The cheongfun was slightly gritty and needed more steaming. Turnip cake was disgusting and mealy. YECHE!!! Overall I think they only stay in business for their banquets and treat their dimsum as the ugly redheaded stepchild - a total afterthought.
Nasty, dirty, poorly made food. The dim sum was mreh, and I was almost poisoned about five times because the people serving the items kept telling me that there was no shrimp in stuff, and then my fellow lunch-goers would correct them (I have a shrimp allergy). I've ordered the lunch special general chicken twice before.  I'm not quite sure exactly how they get away with this, but the majority of the pieces are just bread without any chicken in the middle.  Truly disgusting. Very greasy "style" of Chinese food, poor service, and WAY overpriced. Couldn't drag me back here.
I'll have to give this place one star, because it performs so poorly for a fine Chinese restaurant. So I just went in for Dim Sum, after learning recently that they served this meal.  I remember Ming's from when i was a child, and as I grew up, I developed a love for Dim Sum, and a disdain for the fact that it is not available in the Palo Alto area, so I ran to Ming's as soon as I learned they had Dim Sum. I arrived later in the day, 2:15, so I was happy to order off the Dim Sum menu, as opposed to the carts.  I ordered 4 of my favorite staple dim sum dishes, and was thoroughly disappointed. The menu itself provides a good variety, though the cost is high.  Two crab claws were going to be $8...ouch!  I could not afford that. I ordered the following 4 dishes: Pork Sui Mai:  This must have been the most bland Sui Mai I have ever eaten.  Oh well. Tofu Skin Roll:  Usually this is stuffed with some pork, and some veggies, but the Ming's version is just a big wad of pork inside.  Again, bland pork recipe. Too bad. Deep Fried Taro Dumpling:  This was a good rendition, and if I was stuck on a desert island with only a Ming's around, I would order this again, and love it! Foil Wrapped Chicken:  Another good rendition here. I was unhappy to notice that after I ordered, a food runner brought my food to a interim table that was 5 feet away from me, and my food sat, without steam basket covers, for about 5 minutes before the waiter had a chance to actually deliver it the rest of the way to me.  Ridiculous.  Surely you can teach an older Chinese woman the table numbers so that my food is served in the hottest freshest fashion. Unless I was stranded on a desert Island with only a Ming's around, I think I will never eat here again.  The quality paralleled that of little dim sum delis in SF Chinatown, and of course, those places are DIRT CHEAP. In no way does this place compare with Tai Pei in Downtown Palo Alto for Dim Sum, or Mr. Fong's Chinese in Foster City for Dim Sum.
Food mediocre to poor, service brutal, waitresses rude, price outrageous for what you get. I have been here three times and each time left very disappointed.
I work about 20 steps away from Ming's and have been a ton of times and really haven't been impressed at all. What I've Had:  General Tsao's Chicken, Kung Pao Chicken, Hot & Sour Soup, Egg Rolls, Chinese Chicken Salad, Random Dim Sums The general tsao's chicken is nothing like Mandarian Gourmet in San Jose and is breaded and just not very high quality at all.  When you get the meals, you get some hot and sour soup which is very good and rice and a small Chinese chicken salad which is a nice deal.  However, there is no sauce at all on the Chinese chicken salad and I know that might be common but I prefer a bit of dressing tossed into the salad so I never even touch my salad.  The Kung Pao chicken is pretty much all dark meat which I'm not a huge fan of either. The dim sum comes out fast but just doesn't look very appealing to me.  Some things are cut with scissors in front of you and I don't understand why the rolls aren't cut in the back already upon creation?  I've had tons of things and they just aren't as "fresh" tasting as something I'm ordering off the menu...etc. Nice service and a huge dining environment make this place packed during almost every lunch and is a solid business meeting place.  There is a reason why the yelp rating is 2.5 however and it is because the food is very very average at best.  The bottom line is that I don't come here unless it is business related (Boss invites team out, someone else recommends).
I came here near the end of the lunch rush (approaching 1pm) and all of the dim sum was reheated a couple of times and/or cold. That was a first for me; cold dim sum. I wasn't going to let that stop me from enjoying my taro cake, but it was still seriously cold.  It had likely been on the cart for an hour. Lesson:  come early (like before noon) for fresh food, and not a minute after. The bill was likely the largest I've ever seen for dim sum for two, but I wasn't paying, so it was fine with me. If you are in the practice of paying for your own meals, you may wish to take note of this.
We ate as part of a wedding reception, and we thought the food was good. The standouts were the sea bass which was *like buttah* and the cold plate of meats (duck, chicken, char siu, and baby pig with jellyfish.) The pork skin on the baby pig was fantastically crispy. We also really liked the scallops with greens. The crab claw was a nice vehicle for that gooey red sauce, a guilty pleasure. The other dishes were average, but get kudos for not being overloaded with sodium or oil, if not on the uninspired side. The facility and grounds are nice, although the large electrical tower 10 feet away from the restaurant is a little scary.
It looks really nice from the outside and inside, but the food and service don't live up to its appearance. I went there for lunch today.  Food was OK, a couple steps up from panda express I guess.  I really like the salad though, it comes in a crispy shell.  The hot and sour soup tastes kinda watered down / oily, not too sure what to say about that.  I got the General's Chicken, my wife got the Sweet and Sour Chicken.  It turns out they both taste about the same, except hers came with more veggies.  Besides the food, service is waaaaaaay slow.  There are a lot of ppl there, so they  must be doing something right... i just don't know what that is. Not only that, the price came out to be $30 bucks!  For lunch!   I went there for dinner once, it was actually pretty good, but yeah, very expensive for Chinese food.  I think the bill came out to be about $30 bucks a person and there was six of us.
PRO: Down the street from my house CON: Down the street from my house towards the ghetto, and I don't like going towards the ghetto PRO: Good mu shu pork CON: Bad everything else Everything here costs almost double that at a regular Chinese restaurant (when I say regular I do not mean Panda or Pick Up Stix, I mean a regular dining experience, like Jing Jings.  (Jing Jings is amazing, you should go there.  It's off University which is way more fun than eating on Embarcadero.  Who eats on Embarcadero?  Not hip people, that's for sure). When it gets to be seven oclock at night and I realize that I forgot to eat dinner and find myself alone at my dad's house in Palo Alto, I order food from here and drive the 2 minutes to go get it.  I don't like driving super far just for take out for myself.  Sometimes I order 3 entrees from Jing Jings just so I can get their free delivery. I hate that when I try new things on the menu they turn out to be bad.  I hate that I can only order one thing to be happy.  But that mu shu is really good, so my hate balances out and i don't hate this place that much. I don't understand it.  It's not *that* nice of a restaurant and it's on the border of EPA, so why do they charge so much. In summation, this place is overpriced and not that good.  If it were free or a lot less expensive, I would come here more often than just as my last resort I-need-food-now place. Food to get: mu shu anything BBQ pork chow mein
Some of the food is pretty good.  Mediocre service.  Nice atmosphere. I went to Ming's for lunch again today.  The service was about as mediocre as the last time I was there.  It took a long time for us to be approached by our server and a very long time to get our soup.  I never got the Diet Coke I ordered, and when I asked for it again, he acted like it was the first time he ever heard about it.  In summary, he was at best indifferent and at worst impatient with us. The WonTon soup was very very bland.  It was basically a few wontons in hot water.  Nothing else, no extra taste. The meals were much better than the soup.  My sea bass was tasty, but not at all original.  The other meals I shared were the same -- very good, but not special. If the service matched the decor and the food, I would probably have given a 4.
I ordered a good amount of food online ($65 worth).  I was eating leftover chicken fried rice when I bit down on something hard.  I nearly swallowed it in mid-chew but I was luckily able to grab it.   It was a staple!!!  Sharp edges and all... I called them to let them know that they should pay closer attention.  They offered me a free chicken fried rice, as if I would ever come back.
Oh, this place. Hmmm. What do you want to hear the negative or the positive? I'm asian, but nearly all of my dim sum crew are white. Dim sum crew knows dim sum, but obviously the restaurant does not. I must have been there at least 5 times yet one of those times my crew was placed in the "white room". Little messed up eh? There are much better places in the bay, so you won't find me there anymore. I guess i just like the picture of M.C. Hammer.
This place has the best sesame balls and shiu mais... the dim sum is always hot and fresh, and the people are really nice. Close to home, so that's a plus. Plenty of parking. A little pricey but that's what you get for eating in this area.
100% NOT authentic Dim sum. How can this place be considered dim sum? Sure they push around carts and stuff, but the selection is bleak. They only serve the stereotypical dim sum dishes and they do a mediocre job at best. I asked the waitress if they have the more exotic dishes, like tripe, and she said they only served it on weekends? Not sure if they actually do. If they do, then their weekday menu sucks. Went with my department from work because they said it was a great place. Um... Overpriced, not filling, really boring. Probably better to buy frozen dim sum from an Asian grocery and steam it yourself. Costs less and tastes the same. They get 1 star for decor. Haha. I mean I think they have a wall with photos with celebrities? I don't remember much else. I was just so disappointed in the food there that when I got invited there again and again, I declined and declined. Would rather spend my $$ at Burger King.
I heard good things about Ming's, so this place was a potential venue for our wedding reception. The location of the restaurant is off of Embarcadero, and parking is readily available. The outside of the restaurant looked great! However, the interior of the restaurant was not what I expected. The main banquet area was old, dark, and didn't look fancy at all. In addition, the dancing floor was sticky. The sales manager, David, was really nice and definitely gave a good sales pitch. He will work with any budget that you have for the menu. The banquet menus cost more for the quality of the food. The cheapest menu cost $308 and the most expensive cost $738. I would say that the $498 or $578 menu is suitable for a wedding banquet. Out of the restaurants we visited, Ming's was the most expensive for the cost per table. - Corkage: $20 (no negotiating) - Free cake cutting fee if you do not get the red bean dessert and the double happiness cookies. If you want these desserts, which are listed on the menu, then you need to pay $10. I felt that this was a rip off since every restaurant gives red bean dessert. It's a standard part of the meal! - Dance floor cost $200, but it can be waived if you have a certain number of tables. - Chairs are ugly, so you would need chair covers. David was nice enough to reserve our date for a week, but we didn't call back to book the venue.
I am a sucker for dim sum, what can I say, and too few places in the peninsula serve it up.  Oh I could go to Joy Luck Place if I wanted to wait more than an hour, or to Dynasty if I wanted cold and expensive food.  That's why I still like Ming's.  You can come here at a reasonable time (close to 12) and get your party of 6 seated immediately. The dim sum isn't superb, but it's pretty good.  I do abhor that they charge $1 a person for tea, and at the beginning of the meal offer it to you as if they don't.  I drank 2 cups of tea at the end of my meal today to make it worth it.  It's not cheap, but with a 10% Palo Alto Daily/Stanford Directory coupon, it's reasonable.  The main drawing point is the no-wait.  I cannot stand waiting.
Consistently good Dim Sum. I'm really confused how this place gets such a low rating by others. Try it for yourself. There's a reason it's so busy during lunch time and has been for years.
Eaten here before and have been underwhelmed, but this last trip everything seemed to be on the up & up.  Sunday Dim Sum crowd was a good diverse group of folks.  Lots of older wealthy asians, white folks and young families (safety in numbers). Head waiter is very competent and keeps everything moving along.  The ladies that push the carts seem to quarrel with him when he tells them to keep moving.  I don't understand Mandarin, but I'm sure the choice words are about your ancestors having no honor! The hot red sauce, chinese mustard and soy sauce are in attractive proclean containers with long dipping sticks.  Clean white linen tables with a gracefully aging interior.  Marble lions out front are great photo op with the kids. I've never eaten here outside of weekend brunches but I can recommend this place for Dim Sum new comers that want the extra service without the long lines at the other popular places (McCarthy Ranch's Mayflower and ABC, DeAnza's Loon Wah & Wolf Road's Joy Luck)
Three stars??  Are you kidding me?  I love the dim sum from this place.  I used to work next door and my customers would always schedule 11am meetings, just so I would take them here for lunch afterwards. My favorite thing here?  The saltwater potstickers (literal translation).  They manage to fry this thing but makes it so light that it doesn't taste 'fried' at all.  The paper wrapped chicken isn't too bad either. This is a pretty big place so you shouldn't have any problems getting a table, except during the middle of the lunch time rush.  You may have to wait for 10 minutes or so. The only drawback is that because this place is so huge, there are not as many carts to go around. I have not been to a banquet here or eaten off of the regular menu, so can't comment on either...
For two people, it is easy to get a table, but I find their Dim Sum and Ala carte menu too limited. The food they have is fine and I love the Congee/Porridge and everything about BBQ pork. However, having knowing other places serve more variety for lower price, I don't find myself so addicted to their Dim Sum.
Both sides of my family always come here when we have large family dinners (10+ people).  The food is pretty good and is reasonably priced.  Decent dim sum. The atmosphere leaves something to be desired... although great for families, I wouldn't come here on a date. Easily accessible from 101 with a big (and ugly) parking lot, it's a good choice for group events.
Great for dimsum! My boyfriend and I love coming here on some Sundays before or after church. They have this mango dessert here that he loves so much and I got hooked on it myself! Besides the service always being a pain to flag down our waiter for a glass of water or ordering off the menu, the food is real good. Just have lots of patience when asking for something not on the dimsum trays... some of the waiters can be so busy they forget which tables they actually have to pay attention to as well.
I am a vegetarian.  I only say it up front in case you won't ever try anything tofu or gluten-soy substitute related...  Skip this review...sort of. I did my usual pre-Thanksgiving IKEA shopping trip one night after work and I remembered that MING's was right around the corner, essentially.  I hadn't been here in years and the last time I was here, I was eating meat and attending a Jewish Christmas Eve comedy special slash a chinese Feast and I remembered it being fairly yummy. I ordered hot and sour soup, nice, but not nearly hot or sour enough.  I added hot mustard and vinegar and soy and perfecto! Also ordered the veggie pot stickers.  YUM YUM YUM.  These needed no adjustment.  Steamed but then pan fried just right...they were flavorful. Then I went a little nuts and ordered general's mock chicken (hot, sweet, spicy) and also vegetable fried rice, full of really fresh blanched veggies, NOT oily and good egg bits.  Also ordered the broccoli and shitake mushrooms in oyster sauce.  super yummy. Had lots to take home and ate it over the next few days, happily. Great service.  Plus, I got this amazing show at a huge round table of mostly Asian business men with large bottles of sake and a few white folks. They were getting snookered.  And having a faboo time.  Great people watching.
Their (Chinese) Chicken Salad is so good that my friends who have moved from the area have actually made trips back to the Bay Area just to have the chicken salad.  That should give you an idea of how good it is.  It's get-on-a-plane-and-fly-to-the-bay-Area good.  (People used to fly to Chicago for White Castle burgers once upon a time.) I've just been there a couple of times, but my recollection of the meals were that they were very good, but very pricey. It's a very nice, upscale place.  I don't remember how good the service was, but it was good. The chicken salad reminded me of the same dish at Tao Tao's in Sunnyvale. I gave this restaurant 5 stars, mainly for the food. I had no idea that they served dim sum at lunch, I haven't had dim sum since I've been to Chinatown in SF, or to the little place on Castro Street in Mountain View that is now gone. I guess I will have to go check it out.
I've been here for dinner before, and it was always pretty good, but I was here most recently for my friend's wedding last Saturday.  I always enjoy Chinese wedding banquets, and I gotta say this lived up to my expectations. BBQ combination platter - decent start to the meal, not as good as some other places I've been to. Shark fin soup - very tasty, just as good as I remember it from other banquets I've been to. Sauteed Conch & Scallop - I ate only the scallops, and they were perfectly cooked (not overdone) and the sauce was good. Beef Sirloin Cubes in Honey Pepper Sauce - Good, but didn't blow me away.  The seafood dishes were better. Peking duck - Excellent.  Granted, I don't think I've ever had *bad* peking duck in my life, since you can't go wrong w/ fatty duck (w/ skin!), sauce, and bread. Maine Lobster - I don't really eat lobster, but everyone else in the table seemed to love it. Abalone & Shitake Mushrooms - Very tasty and flavorful.  Abalone is perfectly cooked. Steamed Black Bass - My favorite dish, the bass was nice and soft and buttery, with a really good sauce.  I gotta say the Asian preparation of Bass beats any French restaurant every time. Fukien Fried Rice - Pretty good, and came at the right time since I was craving some carbs after all the meat/seafood. Sweet Red Bean Soup - Didn't really eat this 'cause I was too busy dancing, but I heard it was good. Double Happiness Cookies - It's like a shortbread cookie, pretty yummy.  I got a double serving of these 'cause they were really good and I can take them to the dance floor with me. Service was excellent.  All 11 courses arrived piping hot and were very well-timed.  Some of my other friends were warning me that chinese banquets are notorious for starting late, but this one started shortly after everyone was seated, right at the perfect time and seemed very well-organized (I dunno if that was the restaurant or the wedding coordinator).  They were very good about keeping our water glasses filled, as well as replenishing the wine bottles (our table was the "drinker's table"...and consumed at least twice as much wine as the other tables). Most of the negative comments seem to be about the dim sum, which I have no experience of...but their dinners here are great!  Will definitely come back if I feel like having a fancy Chinese dinner.
Most of the time I end up at Mings, I go here for Dim Sum.  For the last 20 years, their dim sum has been some of the best on the peninsula.  Consistently good product, quick service, and a nice variety.  Lately, the quality has slipped a bit. This review started as a 3.5 star review, but the more I think about it, the less happy I've become with Mings. Their variety, and the lack of greasiness is a huge plus. They have phenomenal egg tarts, and possibly the best chicken salad (if you have to call it Chinese Chicken Salad at a Chinese restaurant...think before you open your mouth) anywhere.  They also have very good chow fun, and their shrimp noodle rolls are great.  Their cart ladies understand English pretty well too, and don't pester you past the point of comfort.  The service is usually pretty good, if you're there for dim sum. If you go for banquets...the food is excellent, but the service is not.  For some reason, they can feed you, but not get the food to you in a logical manor.  For their banquet service, they lost a full star.  They lost a half star for the slide of some of their dim sum. The last time I was their, their har gow fell apart, and you could taste that the vein was left in the shrimp. No good can ever come of that.
I love Ming's!! Maybe because I've came here for dim sum several times, once for a wedding, and I looooooove dim sum! I'm sure there are many hole-in-the-wall places in SF's Chinatown that are way better & cheaper than Ming's, but it's the whole package that I like: clean restaurant, spacious, and tasty food. Important to note: They serve dim sum until 2pm -- great for people who like to sleep in! You also don't have to deal with the crowd, although I think it's nice having a Chinese version of Sunday brunch and hearing the chattiness of all the families around you. Downside is that the selection is limited and some dishes may be cold, but they are more than willing to warm things up and even make things to order.
Great place and location for large business and professional meetings, but average/slightly below average chinese food. Somehow Ming's has become the default restaurant for Asian professional meetings over the years and it has a great decor, setup, parking, etc. But if I have to eat the same broccoli with beef dish and fried shrimp with heavy mayonnaise that they serve every time at these meetings, I'm going to puke... Have tried the dim sum before too and it's okay but pricey. You definitely can get better tasting dim sum elsewhere.
My first review in the PA area and I have to say this place is not worth it at all.  Their dim sum is horrendously prepared and the prices are too extravagant for my liking.  Ordered like 5 dishes and the meal came out to $40ish, usually dim sum is pretty cheap from what I'm accustomed to. For the price here, I would definitely make a drive to other dim sum places to compensate for the high prices and poor execution of dim sum.  I'm Chinese and this is pretty bad. =(
my husband and i had our wedding rehearsal lunch here.  we chose dim sum since we felt our guests would really enjoy having a variety of food to choose from. i had called several months in advance to speak to the manager about reserving a private space, but was constantly told that the manager was unavailable.  one day, i just stopped by the restaurant, in hopes of catching him, but again, he was unavailable.  so i spoke to the person at the reception, let her know that i was looking for a private area to accommodate ~30 guests and asked if she had my date available.  she took me to the back and gave me a quick tour of a private room with private bathrooms (separate from the restaurant's general bathrooms for guests in the main dining area).  this room was actually perfect, b/c it would hold 3 large round tables of 10 chairs each, with ample space for the dim sum carts to be pushed around.  for a party of this size, there is no fee to rent the private room, however, a minimum of $25/person must be reached, and a deposit is required.  i put down a deposit and the lady put my name, number and party size in the book. a few days before, i stopped by to let them know that my numbers had decreased, but that i still wanted the private room, with a slightly different table setup.  they said it was no problem, that it would be taken care of.  i also asked if i could come a bit earlier to setup and put up some decorations, again, it was no problem for them. on the day of my event, i arrived to find that the room wasn't setup exactly the way i wanted.  the number of chairs for 1 table was incorrect, and some of the place settings were missing.  the room also felt very cold, perhaps b/c they hadn't officially opened for business for that day.  fortunately, someone came in right away, took care of the table settings, chair arrangements, and turned up the heat.  i was happy that the room had warmed up by the time guests started to arrive. as far as food was concerned, i believe everyone thoroughly enjoyed the dim sum selection.  some had ordered separate dishes since they wanted other items not included in dim sum.  overall, it appeared that everyone was very happy with the food and left with full stomachs. aside from not being able to speak to the manager directly, and having a few setup issues with our private room, my husband and i enjoyed hosting our luncheon here.
MSG, too greasy, & over-priced. Not the best and you can find better ...
i came here a few days ago for a quick lunch before looking at cars in the nearby Honda dealership. What a mistake! Someone mislead my non-Chinese husband into thinking that there was good dim sum here! We ordered shumai, ha gao, scallop dumpling, and BBQ pork bun (the glazed brown ones). After one bite, I couldn't eat anymore. It was horrible and tasted gross. Because I was so starving, I just ate the BBQ pork buns, which weren't good, but better than the other dim sum. Still starving, we ordered beef chow fun. That was decently OK, but seriously, thats REALLY EASY TO MAKE and easy to find at any Chinese restaurant. I'm Cantonese (Southeast China region/Hong Kong) and I know what I'm talking about when it comes Chinese food, including dim sum. Any yelper who approves of the dim sum here is not Chinese or a well-educated-in-food Chinese person, or works for the restaurant in some way. This dim sum is truly disgusting, excluding the fact that it is not authentic. This dim sum is just bad food, through and through. Whats worse, some of the employees here are Cantonese. How can any Cantonese people work here without being ashamed?!?! I'm ashamed that I even stepped foot in this place. I was so surprised to see that the carts of food were not pushed around at the tables. There were about 3 ladies standing with their carts far away from any tables. Waving them down was impossible because they appeared to be scared to approach customers. The building itself is deceptively nice, but the food is worse than crap.
My friends just held their daughter's first birthday luncheon here.  They have a separate room that can hold probably up to 15 or 16 tables comfortably, and it's a very nice setting (in a separate wing from their main dining room). The banquet food was good, especially the Peking Duck, Ginger and Scallion Lobster, and the Five Spice Chili Sole Filet and Fin Chips.  Timing of the dishes coming out was a big annoyance, as 10-15 minutes would pass before the next dish would be ready.  Also, the steamed rice was served when the main dishes are not even close to being served (and I just hate eating cold rice). Bottom line:  Expensive Chinese food served in a beautiful setting.
I'm surprised at some of the lackluster reviews. Back when they were in grad school, my parents would come to Ming's with other Hong Kong expats.  They passed this out-of-the-way gem to me when I started my undergrad at the Stanfizzle. Ming's stands out as the only Chinese restaurant in the States that I've been to that doesn't smell like a fusion of urine and oil - the chopsticks look like they've actually undergone a thorough wash.  (Am I setting my standards too low?) This is the most white-friendly dim sum joint I've been to - gone are the normal looks of condescension from the cart-pushers as my friends point at various dumplings and ask suspiciously, "What's in this one?"  While I'd say the dim sum is above average (but not spectacular), the unique niche of sanitary Chinese restaurant that Ming's carved for itself makes it very deserving of 4.5 stars.  I'll round up. And to the naysayers who complain about the price?  Please.  This is Palo Alto.  Where can you get lunch for under $20? EDIT: OK, 5 stars was way too high.  Just because it's clean doesn't mean it's any good.  The xiao long bao, in particular, are dry and terrible.
Ming's is OK.  Nothing really stands out.  Of course I kept eating and eating, but it had nothing that really satisfied me.  Maybe this is why I'm chunky?  Even though I'm not satisfied or even critical of the food, I'll still eat it. Anyway, their shau lon pau is not shau lon pau. It's regular dumplings.  Almost like Korean mandu (beef dumplings). Oh, how I miss Hong Kong or Shanghai!
When there is no wait at all during Saturday dim sum lunch hours and the restaurant is not even half full, some initial suspicions come up. And the experience confirmed it.  For dim sum, I usually compare the "haw gao" and the "beef chun fun" across restaurants.  Both were unsatisfactory.  Haw gao was cold, and the shrimp did not taste fresh.  The chun fun was average, with thick dough and little beef.  And these were possibly the best of the lot.  Other dim sum were not very tasty, not hot nor fresh enough, and I just feel disappointed afterwards.  Dim sum quality definitely lacking, maybe it is convenient location for some people, but I do not plan on coming back here.
BEST Chinese Chicken Salad anywhere! Love their pork pot stickers and their shrimp spring rolls too. Their sweet and sour chicken is wonderful also. So much to choose from; either dim sum or lunch/dinner or both.
Ugh, Mings is like a siren's song, beckoning you to come inside. Even though Mings is one of the WORST Chinese restaurants I've been to, I've been there several times. The location is really close to where I work/live and when I'm in the mood, I usually forget my previous bad experience in hopes that things have changed. This last experience pushed me over the edge and will never go back to eat there again. I had dim sum on an early Sat morning, right after they opened. There were about 20 other diners in the restaurant with me. The siu mai that came out was completely overcooked. They were like little hockey pucks. Most likely, these were left over from the night before. The rice rolls with beef was completely UNDER cooked. The dan tat just tasted foul. Most of the dim sum was left uneaten. Only saving grace was I ordered the HK style seafood noodles. This was actually quite good, most likely because it was cooked to order, or maybe because the previous food was so foul, that a cardboard box with hoisin sauce would have tasted heavenly. And to top it off, Mings is way to expensive for Chinese food. Next time, I'm going to Belmont or Foster City where there are tastier and cheaper options.
Had a very tasty meal here this past weekend.  Not sure why this place is not getting higher reviews, but it was quite a bit better than the last dim sum place I tried.  I'd come here again. Tried chinese broccoli, fried tofu, some sort of egg pastry, cream cheese wontons.  I enjoyed everything I ate and the rest of the guests who got some meat dishes were happy with their selections.
Waay too expensive for Chinese food!  I know we are in Palo Alto (well almost - the place is so closer to East Palo Alto!), but the prices are atrocious for the quality of food you get.  No Asian with good taste will give this more than one star! Ambiance is not that great - again being marketed as a high end Chinese place and all.  I've been to plenty of hole in the wall places with way better food and way cheaper prices.
I'm no Chinese food expert but this place was yummy. Its a bit on the expensive side for Chinese food. Regular dim sum plates cost well over 4 dollars a plate. I ordered it off the menu. Not sure if its cheaper during dim sum. I ordered an order of Mandarin beef and two dim sum plates. I ordered 1 rice. 1 rice in this case means 1 bowl of rice. Not one container of rice. You have to order more if you want more. The food was enough for 2 people. We paid about 28 dollars after tip.
This place gets an extra star for being open 365 days a year. How many restaurants besides Denny's can say that? Where else are you going to go when your sister-in-law screws up the Turkey on Thanksgiving Day? That's right - Mings! OK, so the food isn't the greatest, but it's certainly steps up from Mr. Chau's.  Plus, I kid you not - the food is ALWAYS ready for pickup in 15 minutes (except when you order Mantou). Ming's is the place I go to when I'm too lazy to cook and need a quick dinner that's not too unhealthy. Yes- they have healthy options. It's also the place I go to when I want some ok dim sum. Unfortunately, I am not "privilged" enough to live in the city and get yank sing whenever I want... Anyhow...some dim sum dishes are ok - I like the dumplings with chives, the shrimp shu mai and the stuffed bell peppers - but it's just ok. All in all most of the dishes are average. It's not the best restaurant, but I guarantee you that you will come back on that lonely Christmas Day or just for the Fried Mantou. South Beach Dieter's beware!!! This Fried Mantou could end all your weeks of dieting in one day. It's absoluate CARB HEAVEN.  It's basically a sweet bun that's fried ...but to top it off - they pair it with some SWEET condensed milk that you dip the fried goodness into.  It's THE Krispy Kreme donut of China. It's a MUST TRY. I pray that this restaurant stays open 365 days a year for the Fried Mantou alone.....
We ate here for a wedding banquet dinner Sat 9/1/07.  They have a huge dining room or was it 2, but we ended up in a crappy looking room that fits 5 round tables. They had ordered a pre-fixed dinner, I'm not sure the cost but I bet it was expensive.  These are the dishes we had. 1. cold appetizer platter 2. scallop dish 3. fried shrimp balls w/ red vinegar on the side 4. Shark fin soup 5. Peking duck w/ buns 6. steamed fish 7. lobster 8. abalone w/ greens & black Chinese mushrooms 9. Fried rice w/ shrimp, mushrooms, etc. 10. red bean dessert soup All was pretty average.  I'd only recommend it if others are paying. There were men/women bathrooms in the room we were at.
I used to work down the street from Ming's, so I frequented this place a lot.  It's a bit overpriced, but It's the closest thing to Chinese food in the area. The dim sum is pretty good, although they don't have the variety you would find at a dim sum restaurant in San Francisco. I would definitely try: - Beef Udon Noodle in Spicy Sadeh Sauce - Basic Chow Fun with Sauce Shrimp and Velvety Egg - Basic Hong Kong Pan Fried Noodles with BBQ Pork - Ha Gow - Siu Mai - Turnip Cake - Sticky Rice and in Lotus Leaf - Hsiao Lung Bao Just make sure you keep tally of what you're eating- it adds up quick here.
As others have noted, this place has totally average dim sum.  If you've never had it before, here is not the place to try -- you're going to be like "What is the big deal?".  The ONE thing I can recommend here is the custard tarts.  Man, those are the best I've ever had.  Not many cart ladies, of those the vast majority seem to be selling various deep-fried this-that. Of the dinner menu: Moo Shoo Pork - ok, gross wrappers, Kung Pao Chicken - a nice surprise, tasty even. I might come back for dim sum, if my car broke down and I had to walk to the nearest place.  One good, near-ish alternative for dim sum is Royal Seafood Garden in Newark.
There really aren't a lot of choices for dim sum in Palo Alto.  Ming's is a decent choice.  Again, the food is dependable and tasty.  The portions are actually pretty large for dim sum - though not particularly delicate. Ming's reminds me of an east coast Chinese restuarant that was accidentally transported to California.  Next time I will check to see if they have a pupu platter. Extra star since I didn't have to pay.
We went to Ming's for dim sum yesterday.  Oh my God, it was horrible.  The shaomai was of the coarse, tough, hunk-o-meat variety that you get in Chinatown in styrofoam boxes at those second-rate cheapo take-out places.  I also had this awful dumpling (I think it was supposed to be xiaolongbao, but if so, it was the worst xiaolongbao I've ever had in my life)--low quality meat and filled with some chewy, unripe vegetable.  The paigu (spare-rib) was tough and bony.  About the only thing that was half-way edible was the danta (egg custart tart). Have they changed chefs recently or something?  Is it under new management?  I've been here several times before, and I never remember it being so horrible.  Seriously, we ended up leaving 3/4 of two dishes uneaten because they were so bad--life's too short.  And ended up forking over $40+ for the worst dim sum I've had in years. Here's a good headline for my review:  "weidao henxiang goushi".  English translation:  "Tastes like dog sh*t."
Oily. The company I work for orders take out from here. They really shouldn't.
I've been coming to Ming's for decades. I love the spacious room, the comfortable clean atmosphere, the yummy dim sum and the large dinner menu. Their chicken salad is famous. It's more Hong Kong style than Szechuan style (which I prefer), but it's always fresh and I've never had any trouble with service. Prices are high because it's Palo Alto. More than good food and great atmosphere, though, Ming's gives back to the community. They donated an entire dinner for a local nonprofit's fundraiser. And the owner is wonderful - I stopped by for a late take-out dim sum platter and she added a few extra pieces. It's a local business I'm proud to support.
Star 1 for awesome food, loved the chicken sui mai, hong kong style chicken noodles and delicious spa menu. I would like to mention the glazed claypot chicken was very mediocre, i believe it was dark meat and very chewy Star 2 for getting a table very quick and reception with a nice smile Star 3 for very friendly staff, even though me and my husband were a lil late, they treated us very well and did not rush for anything Star 4 for a very clean restaurant Star 5 for decent portion of food in reasonable prices :) Totally looking forward to going back to this place again :)
Went to a wedding reception there and had a nine course dinner. Other than the shark fin soup, it was very good.
If i could rate this a no (ZERO) star I would, HORRIBLE experience, HORRIBLE customer service. The lady who sits at the front desk is the meanest person I have EVER interacted with in my life.I actually feel bad for her gosh wonder what is making her to behave sooooo poorly with customers. If the owner of MINGS read's this they should fire her if they want to continue to stay in business. WE WILL NEVER go there again. It's really sad that an employees bad behavior can ruin the reputation of a business that could be successful. Save your money for a place that treats people properly and has some decency of customer service.
I love Dim Sum.    There are better places to get it than Ming's, but his is decent Dim Sum and I believe that it is really the only real Dim Sum in  Palo Alto. The food is decent, the prices OK (and you get coupons for a discount every time you eat!).   The selection really varies depending on when you arrive. The decor is very corporate hotel, so if you are looking for ambiance this is not the place for you.
YUM YUM YUM this place rules for dim sum! They serve the sweet or salty soy milk soup- and have the best variety of fresh dim sum I have ever had on the peninsula- Ton Kiang and Yank Sing in SF are good for SF.. This place is always packed on the weekends- they serve the dim sum until 3:00pm. I crave this place all the time!  YUM!
You know, we read the yelp reviews for this place before we visited for the Sunday dim sum brunch today. We knew what we were getting ourselves into, but we went anyway because a friend swore it was worth it (at least, worth avoiding the drive to Mayflower in Milpitas). Well, yelpers, on this one you have done well. I was definitely disappointed. Ming's is very impressive from the outside, and is capable of seating at least a couple hundred customers. On the inside, the ambiance is much nicer than the average dim sum restaurant. However, how many of us get dim sum for the atmosphere? As far as the food goes, I was disappointed from the start. Ming's has a few problems: first., dim sum is designed around the premise of high thorough-put service. That means, if there aren't enough customers or isn't enough interest in a particular item, they won't be chosen/eaten fast enough and will just go around on the same cart several times, cold, and gross. Dim Sum MUST be eaten hot. Ming's MUST realize this. Secondly, a problem which might be unique to me- I wasn't satisfied with the selection at Ming's. Many of the dishes seemed... just not the typical dim sum selections. And, because there were less than three carts at any one given time (one with the same items on it from the start to the finish of our visit), it was very hard to see enough selection  to get what you came for. What we did get, when it was hot and fresh, was excellent. That, alone is worth a star. Also, the pricing is decent- a tab for four people came out to $60. Finally, the lack of a wait time was nice, but like I said previously, probably a bad sign in the way of dim sum.
Based on the few times that I have been there - I think the place is over rated - the dim sum is ok. Honestly I wouldn't go here again if by choice but you know how it is, sometimes it's close by or it's central to other people or whatever - the point is I generally go their for the wrong reasons....the right reason would be for the food......but at least the building is pretty and there's a lot of room. ;D
We came here for a post-wedding luncheon for my extremely gracious family friend. I was warned the day before by the daughters of the family that Ming's is not authentic Chinese cuisine. Being aware that I was in for a toned down Chinese meal and possibly friendly smiling waiters, I went into the situation prepared and ready for anything. To start, our designated waiter - a super tall dude named King - brought in this huge platter that looked like fried rice, but as soon as he set it on our lazy susan and I smelled sesame, I realised it was CHINESE CHICKEN SALAD! WTF F F F F F F??? Wow. AMAZING. Next up? Baked cha-siu baos. Okay.. that's more like it. They were okay - I'm not a big fan of them anywhere. Then Shanghai dumplings (siu loong bao) and I was like, okay.. it's sort of more vegetable-y and tame than the ones I eat in MPK. Ha-gow (shrimp dumplings) which I didn't eat because I no likey. The rest of the meal was so totally not dim sum. Lobster noodles, mustard greens, shrimp fried rice. I was like whoa dude, we're eating banquet style here! But, the food was not bad. That's the thing, the food was alright. Not great, but certainly edible. The whole experience was weird. I felt like I betrayed myself by eating at Ming's. Hell, they've got the owner posing with Yan (from Yan Can(t) cook) and MC Hammer! ! ! ! ! (-__-)
I attended a wedding reception here and enjoyed the meal overall.  However, I was a bit puzzled how they served us our appetizer dish and then, went straight into a beef and scallop/shrimp dish before serving us our soup.  Usually, the soup is served sooner than some of the main entrees. Overall, the food was pretty tasty and my only complaint is how they would bring out two entrees at once and then, there would be a delay in bringing out the next set.  I would have preferred for them to just keep the food on a steady flow.
I was jonesin' for some dim sum closer to home (Chinatown too much of a drive), so I went to Ming's.  What a mistake.  The dishes looked okay on the cart, but on closer examination they weren't even okay.  Their hot plates taste like they were reheated after being frozen.  I am very particular about my dim sum though, and my dining partner found the food fine and not offensive. But, then our bill came.  WHAM! $40 for two people?!  Overpriced and undelicious.  Next time I'll drive the 40 mins to Chinatown.
What is that they say about Chinese food and pizza? Even when it's bad it's good? Same here.  To the inexperienced, it would be fine.  To those that have had better, well they would know there was better out there. My dining companion knew this was not the best and she said so. Me, I love dim sum and all of it good and bad.  And was happy as a clam even though it wasn't the best I'd ever had.  And the other person with us had maybe had dim sum 2 other times in her life, so to her this was the best ever. Enough said.
2.5/3 stars.. Came here for a wedding in August and the service was good.. better than at some other restaurants where Asian weddings are common. Food was pretty standard.. there was a wet fried rice type dish that seemed a little odd. But overall, the steamed fish, abalone and bok choy, duck, crab/shrimp balls, and other dishes seemed decent. I would have to say my favorite of the night was the crab/shrimp balls because you really can't go wrong on those. One weird thing the workers kept doing was changing out our ice bucket with a big one and then immediately removing it and replacing it with a small bucket .. and then taking it away again etc. I guess they are limited on ice buckets and needed the bigger ones for a busier/fuller table. Aside from that, I've never eaten here for anything else.
Taste: 4 Value: 3 Service: 3 I've been to Ming's twice, once for lunch and once for dinner with a group of about 3-5 both times. Service wasn't bad, pretty standard for a Chinese restaurant. I think the food here is definitely better than the average Chinese restaurant, but that's justified by the higher prices. I didn't have any major problems either time. The first time, there was a huge wedding reception that took up more than half the restaurant. I guess a lot of Asian couples like doing their receptions here? The second time I came for dinner, the place was actually pretty empty, and I only saw 3-4 other tables filled in our area.
The Dim Sum here isn't that great. There is nothing special about it... They have all the usual items but nothing really stood out as exceptional. It's a bit pricey  for what you get. Yes, the decor inside is nicer than some of the other dim sum places in the bay area. I've also been to a few wedding banquets here. The food was decent...again nothing memorable. If you're in the area (or getting your car serviced at Anderson Honda) and craving dim sum this place is a 3 minute walk. Definitely beats the waiting area at the dealership.
1.5 stars. Was recommended by lots of Palo alto natives, and sorely disappointed.  Food is mediocre and expensive.  Almost better off going to PF Changs for "authentic Chinese".  only giving 1.5 stars because place is clean.
Ive been to this place for lunch and dinner and have enjoyed it but sometimes the quality is not consistent. For instance- the chicken salad when its good- you taste the sesame dressing or the dimsum are not served steaming hot!!! I do recommend the Ming's Beef- which is their signature plate...velvety and tastily marinated.
The dim sum here was OK, a little bland with a little too much cilantro (oh gross!), and a little too deep-fried, but passable.  The only reason we were down in Palo Alto versus staying in the upper Peninsula and having better dim sum was that we were treating out some out-of-town guests who were staying in the area.  Otherwise, we would have headed out to Koi Palace. We had the usual standards of dim sum - ha gow, sui mai, dan tat, chicken feet and tripe.  Unfortunately, the chicken feet was bland and underseasoned...and really it was the smallest chicken feet I have ever had.  Each "foot" came with just two "toes"....either I've always been mistaken about chicken having at least 4 toes or they were using genetically altered chickens (well, more like they were cutting all the chicken feet in half).  The dan tat was bland as well, though the crust were flaky.  The tripe was a bit rubbery, though the main problem was the amount of cilantro they had in the dish. Along with these standards, we had one dish which I have never seen at any other dim sum place - this steamed shrimp ball that was covered in corn kernels.  Interesting combination of texture and flavors, but it was definitely not Chinese food.  That steamed shrimp ball basically sums up Ming's- a Chinese restaurant that caters to a more Americanized palate than a Chinese one. Overall, a place to go for dim sum only if you can't make it to other dim sum palaces around the Bay Area.  The place is nicely decorated and the service was excellent, but the food was just average and not really worth the price.
We had a birthday dinner here. 10 of us shared several different dishes, all of which were quite good. I liked the seafood soup, which was a bit spicy. One of our appetizers was very good: small bits of chicken with a brown sauce placed in a leaf of iceberg lettuce. That was good, but it was the first time I had this particular dish. The others at the table said that the chicken was a bit burnt. My favorite main course was the black bass, though I hear that it was expensive (I didn't see the bill). The dessert, a red bean soup, was also very good. The service was satisfactory, though I was surprised at how slow the food arrived. There were only a few other tables of diners (it was quite early), but the food took a long time. The bathrooms had dirty floors and really bad Chinese music.
Imagine the mindset of a five-person family that forgot to eat a hearty breakfast before the hour-and-a-half long Easter Sunday church service. While my family didn't exactly dissolve into the characters from William Golding's novel, *Lord of the Flies;* there was quite a lot of impatient grumbling on the drive to Ming's for lunch. By the time we arrived at Ming's (around 11:15 a.m.), the place was already in full swing. We had to wait for a couple of other groups to be seated before we finally sat down for dim sum. Within moments of being seated, a waiter came by with water and tea. A few seconds after that, the first server came by and placed a bill card on our table. After a mere five minutes, our table was already filled with a variety of different dishes: shrimp dumplings (har gao), mini barbecued pork filled steamed buns (cha siu baau), lotus leaf rice (no mai gai), steamed Chinese broccoli (gai lan), shrimp wrapped in rice noodle (har cheung fun), sticky rice cake (mochi) shaped into bunnies for Easter (Ming's is not without a Western touch), and phoenix talons (fung zau) for my mom. You might be thinking that I've read a little too much Harry Potter to talk about eating 'phoenix' talons; but that's just the name for a dish of chicken feet that have been boiled, deep fried, marinated in black bean sauce, and then steamed. Unfortunately for curious readers, I didn't manage to get a taste of this. As I sampled the other dishes, I thought back to the positive review of Ming's by a writer at the Palo Alto Online. On the restaurant's website, KGO Radio called Ming's "The Best Dim Sum in the Bay Area". But as I went from dish to dish, I wondered if I was at the same place. Don't get me wrong, the food was good. But that's just it. Good. Well, more like passable good that deserved a pat on the back. I didn't expect everything to be piping hot when it arrived at the table, but I certainly didn't expect to be able to liken the condensation on the translucent wrapper of the shrimp dumplings to cold sweat on skin. That same mental image was invoked when I took a bite of a steam bun filled with barbecued pork and found that the extra steam made the doughy outside quite mushy. The rice with mushrooms and chicken, wrapped in a lotus leaf, was probably the best dish out of all the rest (but I still believe the ones they make at Marina Supermarket on the weekends is better: twice the size and they come with flavorful Chinese sausage 'lop cheong'). The Chinese broccoli was steamed a little too much for my taste, and seemed more soggy. The shrimp wrapped in rice noodle was probably sitting too long in it's light soy sauce bath, and ended up practically falling apart. When my normally picky little brothers left no survivors amongst the pink mochi bunnies, I feel like I can safely say they were pretty good. If you're planning on going to Ming's, I'd say bring at least $20 to $30 with you for their dim sum.   (But if you want cheaper dim sum, go to Mayflower).
Had some Dim Sum for lunch and boy oh boy!! I could have been then all day eating. This was only my second time eating Dim Sum and it blew the first experience out the water. OMG! I had things with beef, CHICKEN, shrimp balls, and some wrapped up rice! Very Very good!! I heard that the best Dim Sum is in SF, I will be making a trip soon! They roll around with carts of food and you just pick and choose! Very fast service! Tiny bit pricey but very good.
Ming's is disgusting. Don't ever eat here. I'd read the reviews on Yelp and was feeling a little hesitant about coming here, but was eventually persuaded by my bf and his groupon. On the outside the place looks pretty fancy, so I was hoping Ming's would surprise me when I walked in. And surprise me it did. If you throw a bucket of food into a gutter it would probably look better than the "food" that comes out of their kitchen. I ordered a sauteed cod fillet dish and out came a HEAPING PILE of fish pieces on a plate. The meat was GREY, lukewarm and covered in some slimy, oily, tasteless sauce, and the way it was presented was so unappetizing I felt sick just looking at it. We also had the Drunken Prawns. In most Chinese Restaurants, this means prawns cooked with rice wine and herbs. At Ming's, the waiter brings out a plate of boiled prawns, pours RUBBING ALCOHOL all over them, and serves it. It was disgusting, if not DANGEROUS. I left this place pissed. Again, don't go.
Mings is a pretty decent dim sum restaurant which is kind of rare around this area. When I first arrived it was obvious that Mings is a very large and somewhat fancy restaurant (which most Chinese people shy away from since that usually doesn't indicate good food quality).  It's almost an inverse relationship most of the time - dingy grubby hole-in-the-wall type restaurants being the most tasty.  Ming's is a great place for large wedding banquets and parties since they do serve the traditional wedding banquet-fare (mostly things I don't eat). It's hard for me to properly gauge dim sum quality because I eat the "simpler" dishes (I don't eat shrimp so that rules out a LOT of dim sum since shrimp is embedded in so many dishes). My favorite at every dim sum restaurant is the rice noodle roll with beef - chee cheong fun.  This was pretty good here with the rice noodle being just right (soft, moist, delicate) and the beef filling was tasty (you need the right amount of water chestnut and cilantro to add intrigue!) Other good (but common so maybe aren't the best gauges) dishes I had were steamed (roast pork) buns (pretty tasty); sliced bbq pork (very good);  sesame balls (sweet, crunchy and delicious); and the dumplings. The service was excellent (cute and cheerful hostess) and both the waiters and dim sum cart ladies (is there a formal term?) were very attentive, energetic and nice to deal with (probably because this restaurant deals with a more "culturally-diverse" (if you catch my drift) clientele so politeness is a must).  Usually if the Chinese restaurant caters to only Chinese customers...emphasis is primarily on the food rather than service because of the more pragmatic and efficient nature of ordering and eating ("just get me xxx and yyy and make it quick while dispensing with the pleasantries") The prices are a bit high but I equate that to the high cost of living in Palo Alto, the large facility and number of employees, the more "corporate" demographic that frequents the restaurant, and of course..the general lack of competition in the vicinity (if you want the opposite...go to San Jose or LA where competition is fierce, food is better and prices lower) Ming's is a great place for me and my coworkers to have dim sum during the work week.  Would I come here on the weekend?  Maybe....there are closer places (in Cupertino or Milpitas) which are just as good so I'd have to be meeting people coming from all over the bay area. I'd like to give 3.5 stars but the service makes up for it with an extra .5 stars!
I went to Ming's for a wedding banquet recently and wasn't really impressed by the food or the service.   The decor inside is pretty nice and they have room for two separate receptions, but that still doesn't make up for the food in my opinion.  We had the cold bbq cold platter, lobster, peking duck, a beef dish, shark fin soup, and some sort of fried fish.  All were okay, but nothing too memorable.  They also took a long time to serve the food.  I swear at some point there was nothing on our table for 20 minutes.  For a wedding banquet, that's an eternity since there's a tight schedule to keep. The wait staff also took a while to handle our requests for simple items like water and tea.  I'm sure there aren't many choices for Chinese wedding banquets in norcal, but I would skip Ming's and try to find a better place.
Came for a banquet. Decent food. Meat appetizer, crab ball, shark fin soup, bokchoy,  peking duck, lobster, fujian fried rice, fish. Plenty of parking.
Dim Sum, ok, not the best in the world, had better. Service, ok, some better than others Their way of trying to make kids stop crying..... Throw handfulls of fortune cookies at you.
Most of the dishes served were salty...good presentation...but very salty.  Please Ming's cook...please get a taster!!!
My wife and I had a mildly serendipitous lunch at Ming's this weekend. We were in Palo Alto making my obligatory Fry's run, and she expressed an interest in Chinese food. I knew that Jing Jing would be too spicy for her, so I took her to the only other Chinese place I vaguely remembered ordering from in college -- Ming's. I wasn't aware that Ming's primarily serves dim sum on weekends. We've had dim sum before, but not in a while. And frankly, I've always been kind of intimidated by it and afraid I'm going to eat something I'm allergic to. I think Ming's is an ideal place to take guests who have never had dim sum before, or who share our concerns over unwittingly hearing "beef" when the actual dish is "something you don't want to eat." The waitresses were helpful in explaining what everything was (e.g. they responded with a yes or no when we said 'chicken?') and while we intially asked for menus out of dim sum fear, we ended up not using them and found plenty of items to fill us. After a while, the carts stopped making stops at our table (maybe you're supposed to order everything you want at the beginning? We were still kinda hungry...). The head waiter noticed that we were sitting there not eating and asked if we wanted dessert. We said sure and he said he'd send the dessert cart right over. Unfortunately, the woman with the desserts headed off in a different direction. When the head waiter noticed, he went over to her cart, took a few items, and came right back to us for offer us our choice -- complimentary! I was very impressed by the service and the non-threatening atmosphere. I also enjoyed the opportunity to try a bunch of new things without risking a possible trip to the hospital. I highly recommend the egg custard desserts, especially if they're warm.
Ming's is the Denny's of Chinese food. If you're from the midwest you'll probably love the food.  The appetizers are deap fried,  entrees are bland, taste similar to each other, and the wait staff speaks fluent English. It's been several hours since I left the restaurant and no signs of food poisoning yet.  So I guess it has that going for it, which is nice... Bay area food snobs beware!!!
Another venue where I only eat the dim sum (its really 3.5 stars but only because I favor the dim sum at the Oriental Tea House in San Leandro over Ming's) and not the other menu items. That being said, the dim sum here is delicious (my fave is the eggplant/shrimp) and although might be pricier than most hole in the wall places, I don't mind so much because 1) I don't get msg headaches 2) the restaurant is very clean and 3) I get a kick that Shemar Moore and MC Hammer have dined there (ok I kid!). Because the restaurant is so large and layout very open, would seem Ming's would be a great place for banquets.
I give this place 3 stars because the food you order is always a hit or miss.  And if you're going to pay for a meal here, it really should be a hit. In one sitting, you can get very good jellyfish (yes, it IS difficult to make well) and very bad shrimp rice noodles.  The same quality is expected when you order the desserts.  Sadly enough, when we asked one of the managers there about the desserts, even he didn't know what they were. In terms of variety, they had too many fried foods offered and not enough of the steamed dishes.  Then again, it may be just my personal preference.  I enjoy variety when I go to dim sum places, and this place does not deliver.  Furthermore, they fail to compensate the quantity with good quality.
This and Chef Chu's I think... are only around to serve the corporate crowd.  It is actually a pretty nice restaurant... pretty upscale for chinese food considering. ... but on the pricey side. I've never had problems with the food quality, or the service.... it's just nicer than I usually associate with getting chinese  food.
I just went here last night for a friend's wedding reception.  All I gotta say is the food was GREAT!  I dunno about price (duh), but the food was GREAT.  Tasty tasty! The best dishes served: Sauteed Scallops ands Prawns with Greens Golden covered Garlic fried chicken Beef sirloin cubes (tho they're actually strips) in honey pepper sauce Ginger and Scallion twin Maine lobsters SOOOOOO flavorful. As a banquet hall, fantastic.  According to everyone else apparently it's just okay, but I do recommend going for a banquet.   GREAT food and the service was really efficient.
Wow!  This was worth the drive!  I usually love Ton Kiang's dim sum, but I'd go the distance for Ming's Dim Sum! We got there too early (11am, when they opened) , so I would suggest getting there (with a reservation; the place gets BUSY fast!) around 12:00-1230.  The Shrimp roll is outta-site and the Famous Chinese Chicken Salad lives up to it's reputation.  Everything we tried was delicious,  fresh and well prepared. The wait staff are VERY attentive and always helpful. You should go!
For dim sum, I liked the beef wrapped in rice noodles, jelly fish appetizer, and the little egg tarts. What was very unappetizing was the fried bread that goes with the porridge, even though my husband wanted one, I told him to wait until there were fresh ones.  There never were any fresh ones and it really was kind of gross after a while.  They had one dish of it sitting on the porridge cart and every time someone wanted a bowl of porridge, they would lift the lid up and all the sweat from the lid would drip onto that fried bread.  Who the hell wants to eat soggy fried bread???
I have only been here for dim sum. My friends and I love going here on the weekends because there is no wait. Ming's is also the classiest dim sum restaurant I have ever been to. If you want to impress your date, then take him or her here. The waiters are extremely attentive. I love that the condiments (hot sauce, mustard, and soy sauce) is already set up for you so you don't have to ask. They will automatically bring out tea and ice water too. It's a plus that they SMILE when they do these things. Smiles and good service are a rarity in a chinese restaurant, especially during busy lunch traffic. It's the only dim sum place I've been to where they seat you immediately. The crab puffs and porridge are both tasty.
Eh, I went here for dim sum on Father's Day with a party of 20 to treat my good 'ol grandpa out. The place is actually nice and spacious. We also had no problems with our seating. The food wasn't spectacular though. Maybe I'd think differently if I tried their dinner. But on a dim dum level, I've had a lot better. I was a bit let down when my favorite dish (the rice noodle sheets with shrimp) wasn't being circulated. We had to request it from our waiter and it was one of the last dishes to be brought out. I was so anxious to have some and when I finally did...it had a hint of a hot dog flavor to it! It wasn't bad, but it was kind of smokey or bbq-esque. Totally caught me off guard and did not satisfy my craving for the REAL deal. The food was not bad, it just didn't compare to some of the better dim sum restaurants I've been to.
I've been here twice, once for dinner and once for dim sum on a saturday morning.  Both times I was disappointed by the quality of the food and shocked by the prices we had to pay.  For dinner, my friends and I had a bunch of dishes and shared them family-style.  They were blandly seasoned and served long after we were ready to die of starvation. For dim sum, I've certainly had better.  They serve your usual dim sum dishes, which aren't hard to get wrong, so they tasted ok.  The kicker is how much you have to pay.  I went with two friends and we ended up paying $24 each for dim sum that got us moderately full.  I know we're recent college grads with jobs, but honestly, this is a bit ridiculous.  I guess we're also not from the same demographic as the palo alto-ans who probably frequent this place. In any case, it's worth a try if you don't mind paying an arm and a leg.
Not sure why reviews haven't been better for Ming's, the place is excellent. I recommend dinner instead of dim sum, though. This is my family's favorite restaurant and we are here all the time. The food is great, service is respectful and polite, and overall the ambience is pleasant. As of late, there has been a low volume of people going there, so it's kind of dead for dinner, but I suppose that makes for even better service and faster meals. Clay pot eggplant is a favorite, along with the mongolian lamb (very well-made lamb for a Chinese place) Don't leave without trying their sesame balls, which are served fresh from the oven -- delicious dessert!
Food of mediocre quality for the "Americanized Asian or Caucasian" folks. Since the location is by many powerhouse companies and right off the freeway on 101, it makes for a great location for lunch and business meetings. Really..the food is just mediocre after having a 10 course wedding reception. It needs some remodeling as well.
Expensive - Coldly indifferent service - went there for my 30th Anniversay. Thought it would be a special event for me and my wife - I went there when I was in High School and College. I had fond memories. It turned out to be just that; Memories. We went early to "take our time". We were the only couple in the restaraunt at the time. Our waitress Winnie, could care less. The food was cold and NO mention of making anything right (other than a quick re heat). Save your time and MOST of all - "Your Money"!
Atmosphere: Fairly attentive service, large setting, very open area. Good lunch crowd. Food: Dim Sum. Nothing too creative, but everything was at minimum-decent/good. Duck was delicious, as was the "signature salad" Would definitely return, but not yearning to.
Being Chinese and eating it throughout my life, I would say that I know it well. This place does Chinese banquet food pretty damn well! I've been here on a few occasions and have tasted 15 dishes from their menu. Here are some highlights: Mayo Crispy Shrimp Peking Pork Chops Banquet-style Lobster My main comment is that it tastes like it should, which in my mind is a huge compliment. Looking for innovation in this style of restaurant is not what I'm expecting. Service is good and attentive, albeit in that Chinese restaurant way where you think they want you out ASAP but are not pushy about  it. This place is cool, I'd go back for sure.
We had group dinner here. It was just OK ---
This is only for dim sum. i actually want to rate this a 3.5.  Ming's is ok.  I like that they have ample parking and the servers are real nice and friendly.  Rare for an asian restaurant. The price point though, is a bit high.  But what do you expect from Palo Alto right?  I think it would have gotten more stars from me if it weren't that expensive.  My expectations get higher with increasing dollar signs. Anyway, the food is ok.  Nothing special.  I do like their egg custards though.  Those things are tasty.  I also like their cheung funs (the rolls are so good and the sauce is nice and light, not too oily or sweet, just right) and the white wrap deep fried shrimp rolls.  I don't know what they are called but it's the only place I can get it (from all over CA).  Mayflower in Milpitas has something similar called Mango Shrimp, but the one at Mings has no mango and is more tasty.  All the other normal items are just ok. I'll come again if I'm in the area- but generally, I prefer to go to Fu Lum Mum in Mountain View or Mayflower in Milpitas.
My husband and I made another 3 1/2 + hour trip to eat at Ming's...well, not just to eat here. This had to have been about our 7th time here in the past 3 years, and our first visit on a week day. I ate lots of authentic dim sum in Guangzhou and Hong Kong for nearly a decade, so I'm pretty fussy. In America I have to lower my expectations when it comes to dim sum. Unfortunately, I find myself becoming disappointed with the dim sum here. The first couple times we came right at the start of service on Saturday morning and it was great to me. Then we came late on a Saturday and the dim sum wasn't fresh. This visit it was fresh but didn't taste as good as the first couple times here. The place was crowded, though, and food was being consumed at an amazing pace! The service is always good. Maybe it was an off day or maybe my taste buds have changed over the past 3 years...or I've discovered a couple other better dim sum places in the States since our first visit here. Next trip, we'll probably check out another dim sum restaurant.
My girlfriend introduced me to dim sum, and when she wasn't around, I was really craving it, so I went out on my own and I found Ming's. It's the closest dim sum restaurant to my home and work, so I thought it'd work out great. This is by far one of the worst dim sum restaurants I've been to. Granted, it has a lot of good things going for it. AMPLE parking (really can't stress that enough at a dim sum restaurant), very polite wait staff, and a beautiful restaurant. They also serve dim sum after regular hours. That said, the dim sum just isn't very good. They cater to a largely white audience, and no offense to my own race, but white people new to dim sum have no idea what dim sum is supposed to taste like, and what Ming's offers is just wrong wrong wrong. The siu mai tastes like it's been dehydrated under a sun lamp in the Sahara for a while. The char siu bao has BROWN filling instead of red and have an odd consistency for the dough. I could go on forever about how all the dim sum I've had here were just wrong, but that would be a waste of my time and yours. I think what really speaks volumes towards the quality of this restaurant is when I went in and ordered some items in Chinese (didn't know what they were in English), and they had to go get a Chinese-speaking person to help me. Let me just clarify that this rating is for the dim sum portion of Ming's. Ming's also offers a regular menu of Chinese dishes, and some are actually quite good, so it would be unfair of me to say that the restaurant is all-together bad.
I hear that they have dim sum here but I didn't have the luxury of trying it yet.  Came here for a 30th anniversary party and got the 007 treatment when entering to get to a private room in the back since there were two other wedding parties going on (walked through a maze and through the kitchen to get to the vip room).   I came late but on the table there was crab, quail, fried rice, bok choy, and chao.  The fried rice was mediocre, typical chinese wedding style fried rice, lacking color yet salty.  (it's hard to get good fried rice I think Krung Thai does it best)  The quail was mediocre as well I'd rather eat quail at any quan nhau in sj.  Over all the food was just okay.  I will have to come back and re-review during shrimp time (dim sum) food: 3/5 stars ambiance: clean spacey 4/5 stars service:  4/5 stars Chris http://marketamerica.com...
Not the best chinese food in the world but a nice atmosphere.  The dim sum is OK. We had are wedding reception here and the food was really good that day.  I am hoping to have another event there soon.
I'm giving this 2 stars because the ambiance and the place looks great. Other than that, everything else sucked. The food was okay, could be better and hotter. I felt like they served us food that was made in the morning. I went to eat dimsum with my parents here for lunch, I've had my fair share in dimsum in other places, and most of my food comes out hot. Not this one, I was expecting more not only because the place looks great and attractive, but also because your located on Embarcadero in Palo Alto. There are so many competing restaurants in Palo Alto that you have to be the best with the best, and unfortunately this one just didn't cut it. I'm not going into detail about what I ordered because I think the only good thing about my order was their sweet tofu dessert, and thats it. I left full, but not happy.
This place is really close to the Shoreline Industrial Park, and I guess its "tucked away" setting makes it appealing to several patrons, in addition to its fare eliciting a mixed bag of reviews. Its proximity to the corporate crowd seems to have made an impression on the right hand side of its menu. The prices are suited best for a corporate expense account, and most of my meals here have been quite forgettable. Other reviewers here have waxed eloquent about its decor and ambience and staff, so I'll stick to a short summary 'bout those aspects. - all of that is good, but nothing that leaves a lasting impression. Their claim to fame is their Dim Sum, which, in all my experiences of it so far, has been a confusing mixed bag. For starters, its hard to understand what the wait staff is saying when they're telling you what it is that they're about to take off their little serving strollers and onto your table. Second, the Dim Sum crew always seems to be in a rush. Put that together with the high possibility of you having not understood the description of what you just "chose to take, off the serving stroller", and you'll almost always find yourself trying to pick apart a morsel of food that you don't recognize. A few minutes later, the most common response to "Well, how is it?" is the ubiquitous and nebulous - "Its interesting". And we all know what "interesting" means when you're answering a food-related question, don't we? In my opinion and experience, there hasn't been a single menu item, Dim Sum or otherwise, that I have remembered enough to look forward to, during my next visit to this place. Ergo, putting together their inflated prices and my inability to understand what the wait staff says (in spite of me learning Mandarin) during Dim Sum lunch hour,  I'd say that Ming's hasn't really moved up my rating scale over the years.
Does Ming's really have a nightlife? The chow mein is good, but everything else is soooo bad and really expensive!
So, I think the thing about Ming's, as is the case with so many things, is that it totally depends on what one orders. Here are some high points for me: Green Beans-- either with mean or with the almonds, both good. Personally, I like the mah poh tofu, but it is semi-soft tofu so texturally it may not be for some people. Here are somethings I would stay away from: the chicken salad, not a fan, and the mu shu dishes, they are not as good as other places around here. They are fast here, so you can get your take-out and head home efficiently, I prefer that to eating there as the restaurant is so enourmous. All in all above average food at average prices.
I used to work very close to Ming's and there were not any options for restaurants nearby but I have to say they have the absolute worst Chinese food I have ever tasted. Not cooked properly, cheap ingredients, bland and tasteless to say the least. It's really ashame because they have a really lovely establishment and some nice people working there but the chef is hopeless. They have their own parking as well. You would think with a large and well known establishment such as Ming's they would invest in a couple of excellent chef's but not even close. I'm personally offended but lousy food. There is nothing worse then going to a restaurant to eat, only to find out the food is tasteless. I have heard from friends that many years ago under different ownership the food was delicious, but that was the past. I started with the "Ming's famous chicken salad" and have to say that salad could not be famous even in a penitentiary. The only dish that had some flavor was the hot and spicy eggplant. If Ming's management reads this review please hire a new chef and restore some pride to your establishment.
Nicer venue compared to other Chinese restaurants but the food is crap.  The only people that finds the food decent here are non-Asians living in Palo Alto.
I can only comment on the takeout, specifically the Five Spice Chili Beef Sirloin and the Spicy Black Bean Chicken Filet. Overall, I was impressed. The first thing you notice is that unlike the stir-fried meat dishes you find at other Chinese places (e.g. Hunan Garden), there is not any sauce. The lack of a sauce is a good thing because it --prevents the use of poor-quality meat that is either  chewy or artificially tenderized such that it lacks internal structure (by papain or some other proteolytic enzyme). With Ming's you're not getting $12/lb tenderness either, but it's tender enough with the chewiness well-compensated for by excellent texture. --prevents the masking of anemic flavor in the actual slices of meat by the sauce. With Ming's you get spice-rubbed, well-caramelized goodness.
Stuff I loved: the Shumai and the fried Sesame balls... Oh so fresh! But I have to agree about the char siew pau, never have I had one with a light brown filling. That wasn't the greatest. And the service is excellent. We had a few extra people joining us for lunch, and they managed to accomodate us by moving two tables together, at peak lunch period! Well done. Very clean. A good alternative to Saigon Harbor.
3.5 Stars We came on a Sunday and they took a last minute reservation of 15 at 11am and were seated right away... That gets a star for sure!  I hate waiting to be seated. The place was clean and it was large enough for my 1 year old son to walk around.  An addtional 2.5 starts... As for the dim sum.. there was no wow, this sh** is good!!! Will return with a big party because they take reservations AND they are close to the Stanford Shopping Center but I would go elsewhere for some GOOD dim sum!
This place is just so so for dim sum. Not great like the ones you would find in san mateo or foster city. I think its dim sum catered to american people. The egg custard tarts are lame. steam bbq buns - I can get better frozen ones from ranch 99 and reheating them in the microwave. the fried rice was alright so was the seafood gravy rice dish we ordred.
I went here for dim sum and I guess my rating is higher than most because we went early so it wasn't busy at all. We got there around 11:30 and things were just being brought out. The dim sum was good; nothing amazing though. Since I'm Chinese, I guess I have this kind of bias against white table-clothed Chinese restaurants getting the feeling that the food isn't authentic, but I must say it was pretty good. Everything was nice and hot and they had a pretty good variety. The service was okie dokie and they were quick to our needs but hovered a bit too much; I kept feeling like anytime I picked up the menu or looked at a cart, they rushed over to see what I wanted. I also tried the Chinese Chicken Salad which I heard was supposed to be amazing here at Ming's. I liked it; the more mustard-y flavor was a nice change, but the lettuce was a bit soggy. Overall, I had a good experience at Ming's but it's not worth coming all the way across the Bay just for dim sum when there's yummier, cheaper and closer places!
The dim sum at Ming's is pretty decent, worthy of a 3 to 4 star rating depending on what you get (some items were a bit blander than what I am used to), however the star of my lunch was the roasted duck...it is off the charts tender and delicious, the skin is perfectly crispy, and the accompanying sauce that they put on it is simply scrumptious.  I ordered the half duck, I believe it was around $13, and it was a very generous portion for two people. Service is good, the wait staff is very efficient and friendly.  I would like to come back another time and order more items off the regular menu rather than the dim sum.  And I will definitely be back for that roasted duck.  Hands down, it is the best I have ever had at a Chinese restaurant.  If I just rated the duck alone, I would give this review 5 stars.  But to be fair, a solid 4, since the dim sum was also part of my dining experience.  Now I am craving that duck!  Can you tell I loved it?
Listen, I have to be honest, the food here is nothing really to Yelp about, but my Grandmother loves this place, so we come here for family meals and she really has a good time so that's what matters. As long as the food is reasonable and my grandmother gets what she wants that's great! With that said, the service has really taken a downturn in the past year (I've been here multiple times in the past). My inside knowledge has determined that the ownership is trying to sell the place off, but because of the current economic situation, it is not simply feasible and not a good return, so the ownership is trying to forge on with the business. A lot of corners are being cut to be quite honest. I see workers sleeping in the parking lot because of being overworked. The food is only standard, and I remember way back when (5 years ago) when it was top notch - when there was a real reason to come out from San Francisco just to eat a meal here. Honestly, you can get a more reasonably priced Chinese meal elsewhere, but the seating is large here and can accomodate many many large families. I'd say you have many more options, so consider using them. This place may not be around long if they can get the lot sold to a condo developer.
I took my girlfriend to Ming's for dinner the other night because she had never been there and it had been a few years since  my last visit. As a bay area native I have fond memories of past visits there...yeah not necessarily authentic Chinese food but always good service and generally good experiences. I have to say the service this time around was horrible. After getting our initial appetizer we waited an extremely long time for our dinner entrees. Other patrons around us were also dealing with slow service... The Ming's beef came out lukewarm and had a weird aftertaste, nothing like I remembered from years ago. Read some other reviews in which it was mentioned the owners are trying to sell the place. Certainly it seemed like nobody cared about the service or food quality. A shame this place has apparently gone so far down hill...
Very disappointed!  I contacted Ming's about catering/delivering food for a working dinner for 15-20 people in a week  - don't even ask me about Su Hong Palo Alto - they were so late BOTH times I used them, I won't give them another try.  After mentioning my group size, the date of the dinner, and that I would like to order items like I have from Su Hong's delivery menu, I was directed to the online order form.  When I mentioned that the portion size wasn't clear, I was told to order 1 item for each person, or triple the item order.  Not very helpful - so I gave up!  Maybe they are so big they don't need this kind of business.
Why all the poor reviews?  I've eaten here for large banquets and have been impressed with the quality of the food.    DIshes were freshly prepared, were served on time, and were rich with unique flavor.  There is going to be a certain amount of chaos when 250 Chinese people are eating at a banquet.  You just have to accept that.  But the staff here are great, making all reasonable accommodations.  The banquet manager, David, is a real gem.  He keeps the show running while maintaining a good nature.
I feel bad that this place got a little over 2 stars. The food is really quality Chinese cuisine. Came here for birthday (everyone loved it), come here for corporate lunch & mingle w/ your Boss. (good). My parents are the Worlds's pickiest and cheapest eaters & this is their favorite restaurant to wine & dine & order lobsters & seafood. The ingredients they use is fresh & pure. Have you ever bite into a HaGow & it's super seafoodish?? - well, not here. You can taste the difference between their basil chicken & other restaurants basil chicken. They use fresh chicken breast & basil & drizzle in clean oil. The dish comes out nice & glossy (not muddy & oily) Well, that is one example of their many dishes; it's quality. Some yelpers might say overpriced. But, you get what you pay for, and if you pay $14 for a beef dish; you will get yummy high quality sizzling beef. Same thing goes for their dimsum: lots of fresh variety, lots of shrimp varieties too, might be on the pricy side - but still good. The host has always been polite to seat us. Reservation works great. The waiters work hard & will get you what you need: example: ice water, extra soy sauce, etc. But they are busy, so they won't stand around & wait on you like a French restaurant would. All in all, solid quality & good white table cloth ambiance.
Have lived in Palo Alto off and on for fifteen years, but just tried Ming's for the first time. I did the online ordering, which was fantastic--why don't more restaurants do this? As we didn't eat in, all I can do is describe the food. 1. Potstickers: ordered 2 orders, got 1 in my bag but that was okay because they were mediocre. They were big and plump, but the filling was not very flavorful. 2. Beef and broccoli: Ok. Broccoli was tastier than the beef which seemed a little mystery meat-y. 3. Hunan Eggplant: Tasty, spicy and a ton of it. 4. Peking Duck: The duck was fantastic, the little pancakes not so great, but that might be a take-out problem. 5. Green Beans with Almonds: Green beans overcooked. We ended up having to toss this one. 6. Chinese chicken salad: half order was huge and it was SUPER tasty. So a very mixed bag. If you ordered Chinese chicken salad, eggplant and a peking duck only you might be very happy. But my daughter is a potsticker lover so we probably will have to go back to Su Hongs.
I go to Ming's for dimsum sometimes because it's the nearest place to Stanford. But the food is really not up to standard considering the price they make you pay. It feels like the dumplings are a tad too dry, the fried stuff too greasy etc. However, I like their mochi bunnies. =). I don't care how much they cost-- they are so cute, and filled with custard that's just the right sweetness... Plus I like mochi in general. So usually I leave Ming's happy because the mochi is the last thing I eat.
Ming's has reborn.  It's been good for about 3 months so far.  This was one of the first restaurant I visited when I first came to Bay area.  They used to mix 80% good with 20% bad in terms of ingredients.  Now they use 99% fresh ingredients.  I guess that's because they cater many wedding parties these days. Coincidentally, there can be a lot of wedding crowd during weekends.  However, they usually make sure you get your food in time no matter what.  I haven't found this round of a Chinese restaurant in Bay area yet.  They don't have anything too authentic, yet nothing too fusion either.  Just avoid Mapo-tofu, though.  My favorite is Hunan Eggplant w/ meat sauce.  Some of their dim-sum can be quite authentic too.  Nice price performance ratio overall. Some of their staff are quite professional and upscale.  I hope they continue the tradition, although I'm envious that there isn't quite a Korean restaurant in the Bay area which I can compare against Ming's caliber.
I give it 3 instead of 2 for the overall experience. For the quality of the dim sum they serve and the price they charge...this place is a 2 star for sure. Not much variety for dim sum and some how they taste stale and microwaved / reheated. And, expect to pay 2 to 2.5 time more than what you usually pay. The service is pretty good.
[Note: it's more like 2.5 stars, but I can't do that so I rounded down] I went to dim sum at Ming's for the first time yesterday at about 11:15 and there was not a wait which is definitely not a great sign for any dim sum place of note in the Bay Area.  The place is clean and the servers are not too pushy, but the food is just ok.  It's not bad, but it's not that great either.  It tasted a bit like it was cooked long in advance and then reheated that morning.  Fortunately, I had good company so I had a great experience overall. The place did start to get crowded after noon, but I have a hard time trusting any dim sum place on a Sunday that doesn't have a line around the block (think Koi Palace in Daly City or Joy Luck in Cupertino).
I had dinner there with my daughter last Friday evening and we had a very nice time. The restaurant looked good, and the service was friendly and attentive. Kudos to Tony! The food was very good and better than other restaurants in Palo Alto and Menlo Park. We will be back soon.
What's the matter with this place? I think this place is completely safe and okay. I think this restaurant is quite underrated. Could see quite fancy tables and great ambiance at first look. My server was quick and cool, though he may not *look* very careful sometimes, but he actually is. Actually this place is not 100% perfect. The restaurant has some room for improvement, looking at customers. The carpet could be cleaner, and servers could look politer. A server or a manager who is not my server did not even listen to us. He came to us bringing fried rice and asked "Need something?" so we said "Oh, yes we need...", he went away without answering. So we said "Hello, excuse me, hello~~~" when he passed by, he could notice us but did not listen what we say even though he did not look busy at all. He said "Oh, do you want some water?" and went away to bring water. Actually we needed another bottle of beer. So I said "can I get another bottle of.." he quickly said "oh beer" and went away without asking us which kind of beer we wanted and brought Tsingtao. Anyway if they did better, they would have more customers, I think. There were relatively few customers in a spacious restaurant. Anyway the food here is okay, and I do not think they serve small portion of food. Do not be afraid and try this place.
We have gotten tired of the ho hum chinese food in PA so we thought we'd try Mings. Love their online ordering and even delivery. We have only gotten food to go there so far. The food is always done when we get there. Order done correctly. Quality of food is far above the other places we have tried. Tastes fresh and less greasy. Staff very nice and actually easy to talk to if you have a question. We are looking forward to trying Dim Sum there.
good
So, as most of you know, a Chinese banquet for post celebration is almost more important than the wedding ceremony itself.  After reviewing all her options, my bride to be friend chose Ming's in Palo Alto. She chose wisely...just as she did, her future husband. At a Chinese banquet, 8 dishes are typically served and represent the symbol of good fortune. With every dish there is a supposed meaning behind it.  For example, with a fish dish, it is supposed to represent "longevity together", or shark fin soup "wealth", etc. You know us Asians, we have to have a superstitious meaning to everything. Personally, I liken Chinese banquet eating to speed dating. The first dish is usually a cold dish of jellyfish and barbecued meat. Just like in speed dating, you are just warming up with some basic conversation.  Before you're five minutes is up, the buzzard hits as another dish is placed on your lazy Susan. Next dish up, shark fin soup... "the flashy bad boy" you are temporarily impressed because unlike the previous plate, this dish symbolizes wealth (drives a beem, dresses to impress,), but you know its all superficial and on paper, and just as sharking for a "fin" is cruel and destructive to our planet, your inhibitions tell you to pass, thus saving room for the remaining 6 dishes! As the next couple of dishes are placed on to your table, your belly starts to fill up and momentum starts to run low. Then it appears... whole crab sauteed/fried in all its brown sauce glory. This dish peeks your interest, he intrigues you, yes there is some work to be done, as we all know, getting meat out of a crab is never easy and can be at times frustrating. But, when you finally taste the fruit of your labor... it was all worth it.  At the end of the evening, after trying all 8 dishes, I leave with a few note-worthy impressions, and with speed dating...a few numbers. I came. I tasted/dated. And I conquered! In your lifetime, definitely take the time to try both...they are fun experiences you won't regret. (Unless of course, you end up choosing the shark fin soup!)
no wait like the ones in oc.. definitely cleaner and catered toward the clientele in that area. food was ok, not sure how the price compared to down home where $20 can feed 3 hungry adults
Seriously overrated.  That just (dim) sums it up.
i've heard they don't use msg in their dim sum and i think everything still tastes pretty good so that bumps them up to 4 stars.  i usually meet my super msg sensitive friend here for dim sum and she's always made it out alive and without a headache. it is pretty pricey but the one time i had their regular chinese food, some bigwigs from headquarters were here and we had some fancy stuff that wasn't greasy at all.  i found out later it might've been a  wedding banquet menu.  since the only chinese wedding banquet i've ever seen was in the movie wedding banquet, i don't know if it's true, but there were huge prawns, fish fillets, lobster and jellyfish in addition to some beef, chicken and pork dishes.  it seemed never ending. as the only single person in my department and because i have no shame, i allowed myself to be persuaded to take the leftovers home and ate well for a couple more days.  woo hoo.
I went to Ming's twice last week for lunch while working on a contract across the street. The first day I ordered healthy takeout - steamed vegetables with chicken - simple, though both the chicken and the veggies were fresh and tasty. The next day I decided to eat-in; the menu looked expensive for the quality of dimsum I saw around, so I went for one of their lunch specials. And therein lies my mistake. It took them a long time to get me a table, even though I was just a party of one, and there were clearly multiple tables open. The waitress was fast, though stressed and not super-communicative. This was particularly evinced when, after ordering, she came by and quickly slid unimpressive hot'n'sour soup and green tea in front of me. 'Wait', I said, trying to catch her. 'I ordered the special, the Mongolian beef.' 'It comes with special,' she said. I was dubious. 'It definitely comes the the special?' 'Yes.' So, ok, I try them both. Both the tea and soup are rather boring, and I could've done without. Then I'm waiting for my meal. I get the special plate, with mongolian beef, and fried rice, and a 'chinese chicken salad' in a crispy shell. The fried rice was bland and globby; the salad lettuce was a bit wilted. But the beef and its spinach bed were good, if a little bland. So, quality-wise, the actual meat and veggies have thus far been solid texture-wise from this place. Unfortunately, it took forever to flag down a waiter for a box, and when I finally got my bill, there was soup and tea on it. Grr. When I told the waitress, she took off the soup, but whisked herself away before I had a chance to ask her why the tea was still on it. So, since she wasn't back promptly, I decided to ask the manager at the front desk. He was EXTREMELY rude to me, told me I should just take it up with the waitress. I said I couldn't find her, and she'd already adjusted my bill once, and that she was hard to communicate with; I was hoping to ask him something. He told me tea is put on everyone's table, and it's their option to drink or not. I said that was fine, and that since I had drunk the tea I didn't have a problem on principle with paying for it. But I also said that I had specifically indicated that I hadn't asked for the soup and tea, and that the waitress had told me it was part of the special; so, in the future, they might want to clarify that more clearly with their patrons when they specifically inquire. When I said that, he yanked the bill out of my hand, slammed around on the keyboard and desk, threw his stapler on the desk before stapling, and when I got the bill, the tea was gone. The entire thing was obnoxious. A restaurant manager should know to treat his customers better. Yeah, I got $2 of tea off my bill, but the way he treated me means I'm not coming back. And I work across the street, so it's possible I could've become a near-daily patron.
Minus 5 stars if I could.. Came here for dim sum with a coworker.  I got the worst case of food poisoning - I don't want to gross anyone out, but let's just say I was a faucet - front and back.  Lab test came back and my doctor told me I got some reportable bacteria in me from the food poisoning episode.  I will be contacted by the Health Dept.  Yes, it was THAT bad where I had to go see a doctor.  My coworker who ate the same thing as I did broke out with hives. Not going back for sure.
I dont understand why this place's rating is so low. Chicken chowmein is delicious and very generous portions. The crab rangoons are amazing. Everything is great, and its a beautiful restaurant. In fact, I'm going there right now so if anyone who wrote a bad review wants to meet me and show me some bad things I'd be very happy about that. GO MINGS!
Mings is one of our favorite dimsum places, although there are better places out there. It is kind of pricey, but it is in Palo Alto, so what can you expect? PROS: - Good selection of dimsum - Restaurant is clean, including bathrooms - Easy parking CONS: - Service is slow and some waitresses are not friendly - They charge for TEA- just leaving at your table without asking if you want it, then it gets added on your bill - No refills on soda - Place is always busy and not enough carts going around.
I really have had better Chinese food and dim sum. Its ok for big parties, because they can accomodate everyone. But if I wanted good Chinese food, I would go somewhere else.....
MING'S Came here for my friend's wedding banquet. I've heard lots of great things about this restaurant, about how great their cuisine is and their excellent service. Unfortunately,you can't believe all the hype. Whereas the food was decent, the service was absolutely horrible. I'm going to have to go into a deep dissertation on how bad the service here is. As I mentioned before, the food was OK, but when it's an upscale restaurant that caters to wedding parties, I expected top-notch service. Unfortunately, the restaurant is run by a bunch of stuck-up assholes. When I asked for another pair of chopsticks, because they were dirty, the waiter snubbed me! After repeating my request or order, in this case, he finally acquiesced. In addition, Jimmy, our DJ, needed a microphone.The restaurant charged $50 to rent the microphone, saying that every DJ should BRING THEIR OWN!!! To top off all the %$&*(that Ming's brought about, they refused to let us borrow the piano! Having seen a piano near the entrance, and knowing that the bride and groom were going to dance to KC & Jojo's "All My Life," I hadthe spontaneous idea of playing the song live and then blend into the real version through Jimmy's mp3 playlist. When we asked management if we couldborrow the piano, we got a resounding, "NO!" They said the piano was too heavyto move, but if we "pay the rental fee of $50" to get it moved, they would oblige! Talk about lousy service and attitude! For the extravagant price that the wedding party was paying to hold the banquet at Ming's, the least management could do, was to throw some incentives in! DO NOT GO TO MING'S for any special occasion. It's not worth the trouble! I would give Ming's a 0-Star rating, but unfortunately, the lowest I can go is 1-Star. I'm not one to usually care about service if the food is decent, but the management and service is so far below "zero" that I will never go back there!
I actually had a great time eating dim sum here on a Saturday morning. It was decently busy but the wait wasn't too long and in the end we were all full to our necks eating only $45 of dim sum for three people! I think that's a great deal considering I can do far worse with two people at some places sometimes. Overall very nice ambiance inside and very clean. Not the best place for dim sum but not too bad either.
Why go here when you have so many other options that are so much better especially for the price. I have had dim sum here and the a la carte and have been disappointed with both. I had the complete lunch today which comes with rice, chicken salad and soup which was around $14. Not good at all. The best thing about this place is the big parking lot they have!
Another Americanized Chinese restaurant that is expensive, overly salty, inconsistent, appears and is soggy and oily...and slightly angers me when people at work say they "don't really like Chinese food" when I'm screaming in my head, "YOU DIDN'T HAVE CHINESE FOOD, DON'T WRITE IT OFF YET". I had it 3 times catered to my work and it got worse each time after.  The Chinese Chicken salad (NOT Chinese/Asian at all btw...) was SO GOOD the first time...then it got soggier, and too mustardy the other times. Um, expensive, I assume.  And don't get me wrong, I actually do like Americanized Chinese food, but Ming's just made it too over the top. The end.
Really?  I know things in Palo Alto are more expensive but this was pretty ridiculous.  To be fair, the food wasn't that bad and the service was pretty good, but when you pay that much for dim sum it can't just be "not that bad".  Seriously, and I'm not really that picky about dim sum either.  I apologize to my friends whom I was visiting for the not so great dining experience.  At least the company was good.
Ming's is not you're typical looking Chinese Restaurant. It's very modern, spacious with several private party rooms, and located in a busy corner all by itself in Palo Alto.  Plenty of parking makes this restaurant an ideal location for all occasions. Although I haven't been to Ming's for dinner, I enjoy their weekend dim-sum.  The small plates are not oily, very flavorful, have fresh ingredients, and carries lots of original varieties and unique creative items not found at other dim-sum places.  The waiters and staff perform extra effort to always accommodate us.  My wife drinks a lot of ice water and she literally asks for only a cup of ice, and the staff swiftly brings it out no questions asked.  No matter how big or small the request is, they always provide.  I like their traditional har-gow and sieu-mai, steamed beef balls, fried mango shrimp (like eggrolls), marinated chicken feet, sweet hot soy bean drink, and red bean fried sesame dumplings. Their sauteed noodle dishes are quite well too.  Water and tea are complimentary.  At $3 to $4 for each plate whether small or large, my meal is always very affordable at no more than $30 tax and tip inclusive for two people.  And eating at this rate, it usually fills me over to dinner so I won't have to eat except a light snack. Overall, this place is great! Good lunch prices, great selection, impeccable service, and old fashioned charm make Ming's your next discovery.  If being around since 1956 doesn't mean anything, ask around and they won't tell you otherwise.
Granted there aren't dim sum places around the area, this is still a disgrace to what dim sum is.  Located adrift from the main action of el camino and downtown palo alto, it's off on the other side of 101.  The selection was limited and it just didn't have the taste.  Pretty bland and soulless food.  Place is meant for people who want to eat dim sum but have no idea what it should taste like.  I shiver to eat here for dinner.
I had high hopes for this place.  They had their poor brains dashed out on lion-shaped plaster.  You know that special disappointment when you go to a buffet where everything looks good and there's a lot of variety, but each and every bite you take is lackluster and each and every time you become more and more desperate for something delicious?  This was the exact feeling I got at Ming's as I ordered plate after plate of dim sum only to find that there was nothing I would ever order again.  Everything was bland, or greasy, or just damned funny-tasting, and not in that oh-these-are-chicken-feet-what-the-fuck-did-you-expect way, but more in the they-spilled-a-bag-of-preservatives-in-this-one way.  Never again.
food so bad. vomitorium bad. nu-metal bad. tool bad. bad haircut bad. does not warrant the prices they list or the atmosphere, cleanliness, and fanciness of the restaurant. this restaurant is lacking in congruency in quality. a takeout order of steamed lemon chicken consisted of processed chicken nugget strips in a disgusting bath of piss-yellow, PineSol-scented syrup. low grade rice and iceberg lettuce on the side. but the sauce, jesus, the sauce.
I'm not really a fan of dim sum, so the items that most people come here for aren't really appetizing to me. I do like the menu items, though. My mom always makes sure to order this yummy dish that consists of seafood piled atop a nest of crispy noodles. It's kind of expensive for Chinese food, as the offerings are merely good, not spectacular. But then again, this is one of the better-decorated, classier Chinese restaurants.
Strawberry compote instead of evaporated milk on mango pudding?  They do not match.  The compote completely obliterated the pudding.  The quite light fried rice was way, way less than the salad on our plates.  And General's chicken?  All breading, hardly chicken.  Business lunch, low calorie, and vegetarian were clues to what this place is: an ideal Chinese eats for the calorie conscious.
The decor is nice and classier that your average chinese restaurant but the food is very mediocre- not much better than the $1.50 for 3 dim sum that you get at your local 99 Ranch.  Like many will tell you, table service is slooooow...they could use a busser (or two).  Our waiter just let the bamboo steamers pile, and pile on, at out table.  Then of course, they tack on that service charge on your bill???
The food is not mind boggling, but the facility and wait staff are extremely pleasant.  Parking's great and the everyone is extremely polite.  The ladies pushing the carts will patiently tell you in english what's inside the dumplings or baos.  It's great for groups and they take reservations.  You really can have a leisurely dim sum experience with a group of friends and not feel rushed or pressure to leave to turn over the table.
This is where I go when I'm in the mood for dim sum (admittedly, I don't know of any other options in the Palo Alto area). While the food and service are just average, the restaurant is pretty clean and spacious so waiting has never been a problem.
I love their peking duck.....so crispy and juicy..makes my mouth water just thinking about it! They managed to achieve the perfect balance of roasting the duck so that the duck fat drips away leaving the skin tight and crisp. Speared between a little rice cake with some picked daikon radishes and plum sauce, it makes for a de-lightful "taco!"
Wow, why so few stars?  Is it because I'm not Chinese and don't know any better?  I get a craving for Dim Sum every 10 years and to me, Mings is the place to go.  I love all the woman pushing around steaming carts and the always attentive staff.  Even though half the time I'm not sure what I'm eating, and really don't want to know, I've found the food to be of high quality.
Thanks to Silicon Valley, this place is still open.  Folks, there are too many better Chinese places in the Bay Area - do NOT be fooled.  If you have not experienced dim sum elsewhere, you need to go NOW!  What they serve is mid grade at best - plenty cheaper joints in Chinatown can beat them hands down, it really is very pathetic.  They should be ashamed for serving such sub-standard food at such premium price.
I came here once for a company lunch and thought while the food was very average, service was wonderful--which is hard to find in Chinese restaurants, even the expensive ones.  Needless to say I recommended the restaurant to all my friends.  The other day I went there with my family.  The service was slow and the waiter and bussers are not attentive.  Our dishes were piling and I waved and said excuse me excuse me....but nothing.  Even one of the dim sum servers commented on the piling dishes as she had trouble putting our newly ordered items on the table.  Service was not good, and when I saw the 15% gratuity added to my bill, I was not happy.
had dinner here. lobster noodles and Fuzhou fried rice and some soup. food was ok. nothing special. soup feels like it has tons of MSG. service was a bit slow. but this might be forgivable since it was Christmas day.
Very nice.... I stopped in for a lunch to go and i ordered a few of my favorite things.  Customer service was fantastic, in and out in under 10 minutes and the food is still hot and delicious...  mmmm mmmm BBq pork steam buns!
Just got back from Mings on Christmas Day (a Jewish family tradition).  Service was HORRIBLE and the kitchen staff had a total MELTDOWN.  We got there at 5:30 and hadn't received our entree by 7pm.  Walked out. Many other tables were complaining, but the hostess kept seating more people. We did get to eat our appetizers: greasy egg rolls and tasteless won ton soup.
Ming's, Ming's, Ming's.  We have an interesting relationship, don't we?  You supply the Dim Sum, I'm in need of the Dim Sum.  On paper, we should work out just fine.  If only life were that simple. 1)  They have a tea scam going on.  Seriously, they charge for tea!  $2 per pot. You have to tell them to take it away right when they bring it (without asking) or you're screwed.  $2 may not seem like much, but it's the idea of the scam that bugs. 2) They charge full price for soda refills.   'Nuff said. 3) When you place an order online, you get an order total and a confirmation number.  Which is great, seems like they've automated something traditionally a bit tricky.  Unfortunately when you show up to pay the order total, it's never right!  They've not updated their web prices in what apparently is a LONG time, as it's usually off by at least $5 or so.  WTF? When I'm jonesing for some Sum, they are ok in a pinch.  Never a parking problem, staff is generally nice.  Food is ok at best, the one exception being the Scallion Pancake.  It's pure bliss. If you're looking for a place that's convenient and will have your typical Dim Sum mainstay, then hit them up.  Just don't except anything other than standard suburban faire at higher-than-they-should-be prices. Mediocrity.
Watching my classmate from Shanghai's expression when they brought the main course was heartbreaking.  Food in China is talked about more then money and when you muddy up this scenario with half-hearted dishes and little soul, it hurts all involved.   Hot dogs with fried rice even tastes better.
I've never been to the place, just ordered (or had catered) lunch from here through work.  And it's good stuff.  I particularly enjoy the chicken salad, and the honey walnut prawns were a hit today.  But then again, I didn't have to pay for it, so I can't speak as to whether it is actually worth the price...
Good food.  I especially like the dishes with the nuts mixed with a vegetable.  I also like their freshly made moon cakes, but have yet to attend one of their moon cake making demos.  It's refreshing to be able to go to a nice Chinese restaurant in the bay area and not have to worry about parking, since this place has a large parking lot.  I've been here for dinner many times, as well as a couple banquets, and have never had a problem with the service.
I've only been here once. I remember thinking the food was good, but expensive (I could have been more cheap back then). And they had peking duck, which is unusual for dim sum. I would go again if I were in the area.
It's not often that I can go to a restaurant and not have any complaints or negative observations about the experience. Today was one of the exceptions to that rule. The wife and I went to Ming's today for an early dinner and all I can say is "Wow!" The service was fast, efficient and friendly. The appetizers arrived quickly and were absolutely delicious. We ordered the Peking Duck and the Seafood Delight as our entrees and they were fantastic. The duck was cooked perfectly and the seafood was very fresh and tasty. We normally come to Ming's for their Dim Sum Brunch on Sundays and this visit was a very nice surprise. We're looking forward to our next visit here.
We used to come to Mings a lot before places opened up closer to us but those places have since shut down and we decided to try Mings again.  Our kids ate the dim sum and we ate the vegan options (including the vegan version of the Chinese chicken salad made with mushrooms, a vegan chow fun and vegetable pot stickers).  Overall, the food was good and well seasoned.  The only negative was the service was a bit slow but the fact that we could get vegan dishes beyond the standard fare of stir fried vegetables was GREAT!  We'll definitely be back.
Great place to go for Dim Sum!
selection was good, food tasted fresh, and service was fast. Pricing was average. great place for groups!
I stopped going to Ming's years ago as soon as I figured out where to go for real Chinese food.  But recently I went back for takeout because it was convenient, against my better judgement.   Serves me right, I guess.  The hostess was amazingly rude and the food was awful. Lots of parking though.
Ming's used to be THE place for dim sum for PA and MV areas but this place is now the worst. Food tastes horrible and price is so high, it's almost insane. i am Chinese, so I know my Dim Sum.  Ming's Dim Sum has the right form (looks right), but way off on taste, texture and everything else.  Even for Americanized Dim Sum, it's still lacking in almost every aspect. Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao - they didn't use the right rice vinegar for dipping.  The filling is completely wrong and should not contain so much chewy vegetable.  Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao should be a meat only filling combined with ginger. Foong Jow (chicken feet) - absolutely unedible.  They didn't deep fry the chicken feet long enough to poof up the skin/protein.  They then didn't stew it long enough, so you end up with very chewy chicken feet that should have just fall off the bone if done correctly.  They didn't use enough black bean, so the sauce has no flavor whatsoever... Har Gow (shrimp dumpling) - the skin wrapper is not transparent in color, which means they used flour instead of starch.  The filling should be shrimp plus ground shrimp paste, but Ming's decided to add green peas!?!?!  Har Gow is one of the principle item for Dim Sum, how can they screw this up so bad?!?!?! I can go on and on.... Out of the 12 different items we tried, only 2 had the right form, taste and texture.  What adds to the insult is the insanely high prices... If you want high quality Dim Sum at reasonable prices, you best go to Joy Luck in Cupertino Square or Mayflower in Milpitas City Square. While waiting for a table, I noticed a lot of pictures of celebrities in the wait area.  Martin Yen is one of them...  I can't believe Martin Yen would allow his picture to be posted in a such horrible restaurant like Ming's... UPDATE - 8/10/2011 I am updating in response to the owner comment.  I appreciate that they are at least reading these feedbacks.  Yes, Ming's like other restaurants outside of China, will serve signature dishes from multiple regions like Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao and Peking Duck.  However, as I complained in my original feedback, they look right in form but don't taste right.  Owner's comments about how they altered Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao is a perfect example that confirmed my assessment.  Ming's may claim they made it lighter but most likely truth is that their chef doesn't know how to make the missing element.  Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao has jellied pork skin soup which will liquidify when steamed hot.  This jellied pork skin soup is actually THE signature thing people like about Xiao Long Bao, and it's the most difficult element of the dish.  It's not high fat or heavy, rather it's full of protein.  In addition, the staff that pushed the carts around identified the dish as Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao and did not state it's altered. Based on mine and myriads of other 1 and 2 stars reviews on how bad the Dim Sum in, I am very confident my comments are accurate and extremely fair.  In fact, I will go a step further and say I have had better Dim Sum in the middle of no-where America where the Dim Sum is ordered on demand and microwaved...  Yes, I have had better tasting microwaved Dim Sum...
The Dim Sum is OK, nothing spectacular in my opinion, and they haven't changed their selection in a year. A lot of the items become stone cold as they are wheeled around. There seem to be two rules for getting service here: you have to be Asian or failing that, Caucasian. Since I am neither, I was ignored. No drinks at the table (no water even), the dimsum cart ladies would either graciously visit the Chinese party next to my table, or bend over backwards to cater to the table of Caucasians on the other side. I had to literally jump up and demand that they stop at mine when my son complained he was getting hungry. I guess they made it very clear to me that don't need my business. This is not the Ming's I remember from a year or so ago, with fresh, hot,  delicious dim sum and service to match. 2 stars is pretty generous considering the service I received here today; it's only because of good memories of what this place used to be.
I've been to Ming's a few times already and I haven't been disappointed yet. The selection is pretty big and everything taste great! However, the desserts are just okay in my opinion. As is with most dim sum places, you go there too early and everything won't be ready. I've found that around 12:00, most of the items are constantly being brought out and the wait isn't that long. A little longer after that, the wait is pretty long.
We only had dim sums here so it would be unfair for me to comment on the food in general. I would say the dim sums were about average in taste, but perhaps a bit expensive. On the other hand, I would give this establishment very high marks for customer service. When we walked in, we had very little hope of getting anything to eat as we had  literally five minutes before having to head to a meeting. But when we explained our situation, the owner ushered us to a food cart, asked us which of the dim sums we wanted and had one of her waiters pack them for us. Talk about excellent customer service!
Possibly the worst chinese food ever.  Although I'm not sure if we're actually allowed to call it chinese food at this point...that said it gets that extra star for all the people watching you can do.
There are better dim sum places around the bay.  Food quality and selection isn't bad, but the premium price is really what bumped this place lower in my "dim sum" ranking.  I couldn't help but think that the owner must've thought that the price is justified given this restaurant's location in Palo Alto.  I'd rather go to Joy Luck (Cupertino) or Mayflower (Milpitas) any day. Post-Chinese New Year Banquet UPDATE Yes - I just did it.  Just when I thought I couldn't give this place any lower rating, I just took one star off.  And here's why. 1) Our waiter was this rude, overweight Chinese man who were utterly snide and sarcastic.  We even considered not leaving any tip, if not for the fact that tip was already included in the bill.  He probably was worried that, if it wasn't already included, we would not leave any. 2) The food was awful... the crab noodles dish was tasteless, the black bean beef tasted like it was a pre-packaged, frozen variety which just got nuked by the chef before serving, the almond pudding was SPICY.  I kid you not - there was specks of chili powder on the almond pudding, which our lovely and fabulous obese waiter maintained is the way an almond pudding is supposed to be made (he probably doubles as head chef as well), and the mango pudding did not taste anything like mango (tastes more like one of those little jellies that you can get in Costco for $15 a pack). One of our friends were asking for a red bean soup dessert and the waiter (again) said that they were out of it.  It was 9PM - how could a supposedly "upscale" Chinese restaurant in one of the most expensive areas in the Silicon Valley have run out of a typical Chinese dessert on Chinese New Year's Eve? But OK, we gave him the benefit of the doubt... until half an hour later he was seen rolling out a bowl full of ... *drum roll* red bean soup dessert to serve the table next to us. That was just it.  I would rather starve than come back to this place.
For this type of establishment, I expected at least average dim sum but what I received was the worst dim sum that I have ever tasted.  They would not even survive in the city and any fast food dim sum place is 10x better than what they served here.  Have you ever seen a BBQ pork bun where the inside color wasn't red.  The potstickers (only reason why I ordered it was because I thought it would be the saving grace) were very disappointing as the Ling Ling potstickers at Costco taste better.  Save your money folks.  And the service wasn't even great.  The extra star is for the photos of the owner with MC Hammer and below that Henry Kissinger.  Can't get any more of a contrast than that.
i've been to ming's at least 20 times mainly for networking dinners which are decent. so the regular chinese food isn't great but not terrible. HOWEVER, today i went in for the dim sum. it was the absolute worst. the dim sum deserves 1 star but bc their other chinese food is not bad i'll give it 2 stars. i literally had to spit out some of the food i ate today. disgusting. fortunately for ming's their prime location keeps them in business.
ming's food is pretty average and service is pretty horrible especially for the price. if you want... Read more 
I just went there last night with a group of friends (for a friend's birthday), and our server Winnie was the most unfriendly server ever. SHE WAS SO RUDE to our party. Each time she served us a plate, she roughly shoved me out of the way multiple times just to place our dish on the center spinning table (never saying "excuse me"). After about 5 times of shoving me to get through, she looked at me and then said irritatingly, "Make room so I can put hot plate," and she pushed my chair two inches to my right. And once, she told one of my friends to stop spinning the center table without saying please.  I know she needs to place the dish onto the center piece but there are nicer and much politer ways to do this. She never smiled, and because it was around 9pm, she looked as if she really wanted us out already. It was very disappointing to receive this kind of service from Ming's, especially because Ming's was my first choice to have a nice gathering with friends and family to celebrate a friend's birthday. The food is amazing here, and usually the server Tony makes our experience at Ming's delightful. Without a doubt the BEST Chinese food.  But Winnie brought the rating from 5 down to 1. Very disappointed with our service last night.
Mediocre food at exorbitant prices served by an ungracious staff.  Nearly everything on the Dim Sum menu is fried, with virtually indistinguishable flavors.  The few available veggie plates are bland and expensive ($6.95 for overcooked, tasteless broccoli), and the meat is fatty.  The menu option doesn't fare much better, and before you get excited about the tea automatically placed on your table, check your bill - they charge.  One star, for its geographic desirability.
This place bites.  From pompous owners/managers to mediocre kitchen food to dim sum waiters who sit around and gossip, with rapidly cooling good instead of wheeling it around, I just don't even know where to start.  I've lived in the area for over 25 years and yes, Mings is one of those "big expensive" "go to for an event" places, but seriously, it sucks. My husband goes there for business lunches and says that it's pretty good, but I would have to say that 80% of the times that I've been there, it's sucked. Today, the potstickers were inedible (hard to do).  Steamed pork bun was so bad that my kid - the ultimate pork bun lover - just left it on his plate.  The sizzling rice soup was mediocre.  The bok choy was woody AND overcooked.  The prawns with walnuts were stone cold, with congealing mayo on top.  Yum! Today, the food was so bad that we telephoned the family that was joining us and told them not to waste their time and money!  Now THAT's bad! Give it up.  We go to Yank Sing in SF for dim sum.  And frankly, the people who mention costco and panda express as options might just have a little bit of a case!
Workday dim sum was quite disappointing. I met a former colleague of mine who also is a dim sum fan and we both felt many of the dishes were not prepared with the skill or care needed.  Can't recommend the lunch dim sum. Sorry.
4 star rating based on recent dinner experience, so no dim sum involved. Honey walnut prawns were... Read more 
I'm a vegetarian and I was assured everything labeled vegan was indeed vegan... I'm not questioning that per say, but I then again I was there 30 minutes ago and I am already posting that my boyfriend and I are both nauseous. The garlicky green beans were good... that was about it.
Ming's restaurant in Palo Alto. I made a great choice by going with this place. I wanted Dynasty at first but they didn't have the date i wanted, so my only choice was Ming's. So glad i went with Ming's!! The manager there is really easy to work with. They don't have strict policies like other places do. We had less tables than expected and didn't give them the count til the day of and they charged us for the tables we used and not for what we booked for. I also like the fact that this place is not in a shopping plaza and there's plenty of parking right in front.  The food tasted great as well.   I would do another party here in the future!!
I used to love this place.  We'd take our kids here for a Dim Sum lunch three Sunday's a month.  Something has definitely changed; I've noticed it for a few months but have held off writing assuming it was one bad visit (than two, then three, etc...)  This Sunday the place was still bustling but food tasted even more horrifically bad than usual - almost like the chefs were on strike.  And the service, which in the past was just blandly impersonal, just went into ignore mode. While I love that it's a local Palo Alto institution its hard to justify coming here for the food or service. It was almost like the management went on vacation or sold the place.  Is Vicky Ching, the owner, still around?  If so, this place needs your serious attention.
This place has its good days and okay days. When it has its good days the place is awesome!!!!! My family loves the duck, jellyfish, sesame balls, pork buns and the sticky rice. Definitely a place to go for a nice lunch.
Nice decor. Plenty of parking. Generally friendly service. I like that they keep chili and Chinese hot mustard on the table and bring dipping dishes for your own sauce. But the food was terrible. I agree with previous reviews that the dim sum items taste very inauthentic, all the "meat" fillings had a funky, pseudo processed meat texture, and the rice wrappers were soggy. And it's kind of expensive. Two people, one tea pot ($2), 5 items plus tax = $30. The prices are reflective strictly of the Palo Alto location, not the food. I would only come back if (a) I had to, (b) Groupon/Trubates/LivingSocial had a killer coupon.
Wow, just got take out from here and the food is inedible. We ordered the Butterfly Prawns, Spring Rolls, and Chicken Chow Mein. Maybe the other things are good, but definitely not this.
My husband and I went for lunch, thinking a reputable place like Ming's must have good dim sum.  We were seated in the corner of a back room (not the main dining room). From where we were sitting, we could see the carts come out of the kitchen and saw many more go in to the main dining room than coming in to our room.  The carts that did come in had the same dishes over and over.  At one point, our table was empty, having been cleared of the few unimpressive dishes we'd gotten, when a server came over asking if we'd like the check, to which I said, "No!  We're still hungry!" We finally gave up waiting for a different cart to come by and got our check.  We were horrified to see the total was over $40.  What a rip off for not great food and not much of it!  We will never go back.
First time here today and I must say that it was pretty decent dim sum from the few plates that we tried, not considering the regular menu items. The BBQ pork pastry, braised tofu and vegetable fried roll were tasty but the chicken siu mai/dumpling was not temperature hot, it was barely warm. Then my colleagues ordered a bunch of ala carte dishes but the dishes were just mediocre. It was a first time dim sum for some of them so maybe we'll come back to try other dim sum plates. The place was packed to the brimm during lunch hour, must be popular spot for business luncheon. I didn't hear very good things about the dinner menu hence lunch will suffice for now.
Decent Dim Sum.  Pretty Pricey.  Nice Clean Atmostphere.  They got these great little pekking duck sandwich things you should get.  That's 'bout it.
EXCELLENT food.  Lots of variety.   I don't usually like the chinese chicken salad ever, but i ordered it here once on a recommendation and it freaking rocks.  This place is worth the drive if you don't live near.  Prices are a little higher that you might expect, but they're not astronomical, and the excellent food is worth the cost.
Been there once with my bosses.  We were seated right away cuz my boss knew the owner.  Food was great and I ate most of the food because my bosses were talking about work which I had no interest in.  Their fried cheese was really good.  Probably won't go back again since there are tons of dim sum places in the city.
The food is really good, but the place feels old and run down. It's pretty dead during dinner.
A place one would take visitors from China.
After a long time not eating at Ming's, we just ate there yesterday (Tuesday, 4/14/2009) for dim sum.  It (unfortunately) met my very low expectations. Here's the good news: - They gave us noticeably awesome service. - They took our dirty dishes away immediately - The carts came by very frequently - The restaurant is very clean Here's the bad news: - If you go to a Chinese supermarket, buy frozen shumai, and then heat them up in the microwave, those shumai will taste better than what Ming's can offer. - The prices at Ming's are way expensive Sadly, we live right in Palo Alto, so Ming's is the closest dim sum place to our house.  However, in over 5 years of living in Palo Alto, we've only gone there a few times, and we're Chinese! I've come to the conclusion that they have a good dim sum chef and a bad dim sum chef.  If you get lucky, the good chef is working and the dim sum tastes good.  If you get unlucky, you get the worst dim sum that California has to offer, and that's what happened on Tuesday.  In 4 dim sum attempts in 5 years, their dim sum tasted good only once! If you have the unfortunate experience of having to eat dim sum at Ming's, get their "changfun" because that dish actually does taste good over there.
Over-priced, snobby establishment which serves up mediocre Chinese food. I guess they feel they can jack you since you're sitting in a clean, white linen tableclothed environment. Waiters are non-attentive -- even though your tea pot has had its cover opened for a long time (what you do at Chinese restaurants when your teapot is empty). I can deal with bad service if the food is good, BUT... it's so-so. Been there, never again!
My uncle had his wedding banquet here, beautiful exterior/interior, terrible service, less than stellar food, but I guess they think PA residents don't know any better.
2.5 stars. I'm not sure why this place is so popular amongst the business crowd. It's ok food but I definitely would not seek it out. Perhaps because there's so little choice in PA for decent Chinese food. I'd probably go out of the way to Millbrae to get much much better...
I go here for the dim sum lunches and for the chinese chicken salad. Not the greatest service, but I like the food enough to come back.
Good for a banquet, nice setting, private rooms. Food is standard chinese american fare. Standouts inclue the seafood tofu soup and the sesame rice balls.  The banquet staff will negotiate with you on the menu.
Great Dim Sum. I have friends who I brought who are vegetarian and I was surprised at how many veggie choices there were (if you know dim sum... or chinese food in general, you know that Chinese people aren't very accommodating of vegetarians). They also have decent a la carte foods as well. Moderately priced. For those people looking for genuine Chinese food... this is a close as you'll get without traveling northing to burlingame and SF or south to Cupertino. Not many of the waiters speak Cantonese but most speak Mandarin.
Everyone seems like they've had some kind of wedding here so I guess this is the Asian wedding spot in Palo Alto.  Although after reading the various reviews, does not sound like a  place I want to have my wedding at.  The dim sum we had for lunch was very mediocre.  Nothing really stood out.  I also can't comment on prices because my company picked up the tab.  If I wasn't going here for a business meeting, the $4 bridge fare in addition to the gasoline costs from Hayward would have really made this a very expensive meal for mediocre food.
Decent dim sum. What makes Ming's stand out is their location and decor (it's not the typical oily/dirty/rustling Chinese restaurant).
We came here for lunch on Saturday - I'm fairly new to the whole dim sum thing but enjoyed some vegetarian noodles and chinese broccoli. I love how efficient the whole process is and the service is excellent (the water guy was amazing!). It's a great place for a large family gathering. There's plenty of parking and the restaurant seems to be very clean. Can't say I'm personally a huge fan of dim sum but if you are, you'll probably enjoy this place!
The ordered dishes are way too overpriced, and the dimsum is decent but ordinary and oft underwhelming. Okay, so  the dim sum prices are not ridiculously out of line given the location, but you could always get another type of food.  If you've got the time drive to JLP in cupertino, koi palace in daly city, or fook yuen in millbrae (skip flower lounge, it ain't what it used to be) you should suck it up and dodge mings.
It's ok, especially for large parties. A Chinese friend of mine had his birthday party here once. I don't think he'll ever do it again. There are far more authentic places in Mountain View, Cupertino, and Milpitas. But it's not as bad as Chef Chu's! If you don't see any Asians, it's failed the AQ (Asian Quotient), and you should walk right back out. That said, YMMV. I do like the Lunar New Year cakes they sell, though.
Went to lunch there today after not having been there for over a decade and was totally disappointed.  Ming was one of the highlights in Chinese food back in the 80's when it first opened.  Now, it is unfortunately a wanna be Chinese restaurant that caters to Americans who don't know what is good (or even average) Chinese food.  A couple of us had the fish filet business lunch which gave you a large plate of frozen fish filet fried in oil with cornstarch and MSG.  There is no greens or anything which would make it more balanced.  I was kind of sick afterwards from eating about half the dish.  Some others in my party ordered the General Tsao chicken which consisted of low quality diced chicken fried in a lot of oil with a very heavy and salty sauce.  You can't taste the chicken at all. Service was not there... no refill on water or tea unless you try to hail down a waiter.  Someone in our group brought a box of French pastries which we gave to the waiter when we first sat down to ask them to bring after our meal... Big mistake.  When we finished the entrees, one of the waiters just plopped down the check and fortune cookies and walked away without even giving us a second to ask for our desserts.  We had to once again wait for 10 minutes to try to hail another waiter to get our box of pastries back.  Amazing how there is no coordination in service in the dining room. Anyway, if I have one good thing to say is its convenient location off 101 and lots of parking.
Don't have much more to add than what everyone else has said.  A little too greasy (even for dim sum), not too much in terms of variety, and a little pricey.
This is one of the better dim sum places that I've been to.  Here I've always been seated quickly (and I've been to Mings 4-5 times with friends and co-workers), and during busy times and not so busy times.  I even managed to get my unadventurous in-laws to try something new and get dim sum from here.  I like Mings better than the place in cupertino village always gives me a bad stomach ache afterward (and not because I was full).
A bit overpriced, but the food is great, flavors are awesome and it is cooked right.  The walnut shrimp is better than you can get at almost any Chinese restaurant.
It's awesome food, but there are plenty of other chinese places with the same quality with more afforable prices.
I've been going to Ming's for dim sum with my family for about 10 years, and each year the dining experience becomes worse and worse. Don't get me wrong, the food is decent (hardly warrants the "worst Chinese food ever" comment), but not worth the price or slow service, especially when there are better dim sum options a few towns over. The cleanliness of the place is something I usually complain about, because although the restaurant presents itself as a "fine dining" establishment (white table clothes, waiters and servers in professional uniforms, etc.), I'm almost always stuck in a grungy  booth that some kid before me spat up half his lunch in. However, Ming's is still a decent place for a dim sum fix, and is a good place to entertain a large party.
Fair showing for dim sum, though prices are rather high and I typically prefer to head down to Cupertino or up to Millbrae. Have had dinner there a few times, all banquets. One was a banquet with primarily non-Chinese, and was sorely disappointed by the menu that they served. I almost headed up to Milpitas for xiao ye afterwards... instead I just went home and had some cereal. Other have been for Chinese wedding banquets with better food quality, but service during the banquets is rather sketchy.
Good food but definitely overpriced for casual dinner purposes. There are thousands of other fine Chinese restaurants at a fraction of the cost here...
I had A farewell lunch and it was moderately ok. Nothing really stood out but the service is very slow. Took forever to hail a person down to get water or order from the menu or to get the check.
Usually our company lunch meetings go well, but this time I was really disappointed with the restaurant of choice.  The staff was rude, food was bland, and it was way too warm and too crowded.  I'll never go back.
I' ve been to oh like a billion Chinese weddings here. Those Chinese sure are prolific breeders here, maybe it's the lack of the one child policy here in the states. Anyway, as far as Chinese banquets go, Ming's is definitely a nice way to class it up. The food is good, the portions generous and the rooms are actually really nice. They also do a good job of  "Americanizing" the food enough for your white friends. You know what I mean, making sure there's plenty of bbq pork next to the jellyfish. Mmmmmm, jellyfish.
The worst dim sum I've had in a long time.  I was so excited that a bunch of us from the office were going for dim sum and most of us (the authentic ones {read:Chinese}) was sorely disappointed.  The staff should be ashamed.
Whoever is grading this Restaurant more than 3 stars are either friends, relatives or dont have a clue.Worst Dum sum I ever have period.To top it off they over charge for this crab.
the food is passable.  The selection is alright, but the service!!  Oh my god, the service!  Never going back there.
Wow, I am really surprised by all the low reviews. I have been many times, always good. I have never tried dim sum, so don't know about that. But dinners always good. The barbequed duck or Peking Duck are good. If worried about fat, just cut the skin off, almost no fat without skin. Almond  chicken is also good, as is (I think) fish with black bean sauce. Mings beef is really good, outstanding, and I usually don't eat beef. Hot and sour pretty good, mantou are unusual and tasty. Desserts are weak, don't try. Otherwise good.
Good dim sum but kind of expensive. At least I think it 's good. Though I'm not Chinese.
It's an alright Chinese place. Nothing great, except it's pretty big restaurant. I hear that at lunch time it is packed, I don't know why.. may be there's no other better restaurant on the east side of 101N.
I went here for dim sum today and it was just passable.  First off, dim sum is best when it's hot and fresh.  Our selections seemed like they'd had a few too many passes around the dining room.  My mother-in-law actually complained to one of the managers there and he tried to blame it on the air conditioning.  Ummm...me thinks not.  Next time I'll stay down in the South Bay and head to Dynasty or Pan Tao for dim sum.
We went to Mings for Dim Sum recently.  It is definitely not as good as my usual Dim Sum spots in Millbrae or Cupertino.  Maybe cause I went rather late, but there wasn't much selection as well.  I've also been there a number of times banquets and those were not memorable as well.  The food is alright (at least it's not Americanized Chinese) but it's not great.  But if you are going to do an event at a Chinese restaurant near PA, they do have nice rooms they can set aside.  The decor is also nicer than many Chinese restaurants.
This is a good place if you have lots to spend on dim sim. They have a large variety of it being passed around in carts. The entrees are always questionable, it all depends what you order. The specialty they have is the chicken salad, but its not that special. I would suggest coming here early for lunch if you want to try it out. It gets really noisy in here and it hard to converse with the people your with.
I went to a wedding reception here and I was either completely loaded or the Sea Bass was absolutely amazing and tasted like it was melting in my mouth.  It was a large piece piece of seared sea bass served family style and the thought of it makes me want to go back.  I hope I do not have to drink 1/2 a bottle of cognac to recreate the taste.
I was just there over the weekend for my cousin's wedding.  I didn't think the food was that great...it was just OK.  Nothing too special so it wasn't very memorable.   Not going back there any time soon!
Another place I haven't been to for awhile. I was pleasantly surprised to see that they have updated their dim sum offerings to include more vegetarian dishes. For once, I didn't have to order off of the menu and I got quite a few dishes right off of the carts. I got the seaweed salad, chow fun, spicy wontons and tofu. All of it was pretty good. And it appears that everyone else also enjoyed their meat/seafood items.
My company is literally down the street from this place so my coworker and I come here often to enjoy their dimsum. Never had any issues with the service however, expect a long wait if you come around noon time. Food is always fresh and hot from the cart. I always tend to get the same thing everytime (shu mai, Har gow, porridge, chinese brocolli and egg custard). For the 2 of us the bill has always been around $30~ for lunch. Not too bad for dimsum in Palo Alto.
Do you want the good news or the bad news first? OK, Good News:  the younger waiters and the serving ladies are friendlier than in the past (sorry, that's it for all the good news). Bad News:  The food has continued to deteriorate into a bad joke at exhorbitant prices.  Ming's is a rip-off pretending to be a classy dim sum and Chinese food venue. The dim sum at Ming's was always marginal at best, but at least you had the feeling you weren't eating something that was days old and simply reheated into oblivion.  That's Ming's "quality": Reheated, days-old dim sum that in some cases is frankly inedible and potentially dangerous.  Take the siu mai (please...take them somewhere out-of-sight and dispose of properly).  These are little pockets of tasteless, dense, chewy pork that are served at room temperature.  Can't they at least serve something hot?--apparently not.  Same with the Har Gaw (shrimp dumplings).  These were brought to our table and pulled out cold (at this point I was hoping for room temperature as the best case).  The reheated and old dumplings had melded the casing to a blog of shrimp-like material inside.  In fact, you could not even tell that the stuffing were at one time actually shrimp (I hope).  It was just some blob of pinkish matter.  Seriously, these appeared to be multi-day old reheated food product that no one in the kitchen ever bothered to check.  The Ming's motto: Just keep serving it until its gone--no matter how many days old and how many times fired up in the microwave.  The last example were the inedible "pot stickers."  Again, these were reheated, multi-day old, tasteless garbage that we could not stomach and had to leave behind untouched and uneaten. Summary:  Ming's is TERRIBLE and EXPENSIVE.  Start to finish it is a comlete rip-off.  Avoid this place at all costs.
Came here multiple times. The dimsum is decent, but not the best value specially considering the price. Expect lack of varieties of dim sum, spotty service sometimes, and food is full of MSG (not sure which dish though). I was very thirsty after having the dim sum here despite the fact that I have just drunk pots of tea.
Dim sum is pretty good. I go here occasionally to get my dim sum fix. Service is quite good. Decent variety and nice looking place. Might be a little on the expensive side.
Mother's Day dinner with the familily of nine. No special menu for this special day like many other high end Chinese restaurants. Ordered the banquet menu ($288) for ten and added the Peking duck because my son, visiting from school for Mother's Day loves Peking duck. The family was pleasantly surprised at the quality and quantity of the menu. I would have given it 4 stars except when we were being seated, 3 out of the 10 chairs still had food crumbs on it. I was also surprised at how empty the restaurant was (only about half-full) for this special day for mothers. All in all, I would come again for lunch or dinner.
Good, solid, standard dim sum fare.  Nothing super special but pretty good if you have a dim sum itch while in the Peninsula.  Shrimp rice noodle rolls are pretty tasty, but that's my favorite kind of dim sum anyway.  The crab rangoon is also a must have.   I can't have the chinese chicken salad because of my peanut allergies, but all my friends rave about it. I came here with my secretary one day, and my stomach had been acting up (not because of the food here, just because of internal issues).  We hop back on 101 to get back to work and see that traffic is at a standstill, a complete and utter standstill.  Right then and there, my stomach was gurgling, my face was sweating, and I knew that I needed to find a bathroom, stat.  I almost started to cry and my secretary was trying to figure out what to do...we couldn't back up because we were already on the freeway a little passed he Embarcadero exit, and the accident induced traffic wasn't letting up any time soon.  So, I decide to run out of the car...have my secretary take the wheel...and run along the side of 101 in my skinny jeans, tucked into boots, with tights underneath...not to mention a shirt and a sweater on top.  These clothes do NOT make for a good outfit to a) run backwards on the freeway in and b) certainly not made for quick removal.  The ten minutes I took to run back to Ming's was probably the longest ten minutes of my life...but I made it (just barely). That is why Ming's will always have a special place in my heart.  And why my secretary received an extra special Christmas present that year.
This place is fine if you're hosting people who don't know what authentic Chinese food tastes like.  It caters to the VC crowd of Palo Alto, so it's interior is comfortable.  There are items on the menu like Chinese Chicken Salad and a lot of sweet & sour...it's the closest Chinese restaurant to my office in EPA, so we do lunch here quite frequently.  When in a bind, it hits the spot, but if possible, go spend your hard earned money somewhere else with more delicate flavors.
From the looks of the parking lot, this place is huge and very popular.  Dim sum seems to be their big thing.  We had 3 items and weren't impressed.  I also had the Monday special, beef and snowpeas, and it was pretty good- very tender meat that came with some bland fried rice and some super bland chinese chicken salad.  My husband had walnut glazed shrimp, which were also pretty good, but he couldn't take more than a bite of the salad.  Needs more dressing.  The hot and sour soup was ok, not bad.  Needed some green onions for color or something.  I think this is a no-return for us.  It's ok but very average.  Service is a rare commodity.
DIM SUM!!!!!!!  I love dim sum, it's like going to a sushi boat place, except the carts are pushed around by people and not on a gross little river of water, in a boat. lol. We went to the weekend dim sum which was really good. I have to agree it wasn't very oily and you could tell they whipped up everything  fresh. I was especially surprised to find a lot of the old school dishes, from my youth and some newer things I hadn't seen before. I like dim sum more as a reason to spend time with my family over hot tea and the ordering of specific Asian dishes. (having someone in your party, fluent in Chinese definitely helps), for the most part its an experience thing for me. But then again most of the time when I go out to eat its the experience I leave with that makes me come back. Service was a bit lacking though, but hey its nothing a little duck porridge can't fix.
Overall this is a good standard chinese food restaurant.  The Dim Sum is great.  The food is consistent.  Honey Walnut Prawns has too many sesame seeds on it and too much mayo sauce,  Staff is ok, but needs to be more friendly.
Warning: this review might not be too accurate because I just got back from Hong Kong (and its delicious dim sum) Been here many times, food is good,  one of the few places that serves dim sum for those who live in palo alto. Dinner isn't that great, Dim Sum is really the star. (except for the ming's beef which is so good). Service is friendly, (the higher level people at least). They have everything you would expect, and probably more. Definitely a large selection. I recommend the mock chicken, a fried fish dish that will come on one of the carts, the shrimp and mango roll, and the tapioca desert. The Chinese Chicken Salad is also good. By the way, there is a picture of mc hammer on the wall with the owner. If he likes it, I like it.
and services are good. But this is not a good place for "drink tea" We ordered 8 dim sum and the bill was $50, which I was little un expected.
um most disappointing chinese food i've had in awhile.  even something simple like chow mein was flavorless.  usually i'm not too harsh, so i'll stop right there.
Overpriced mediocre food. This just about sums it up. It's a HUGE place, much like you'd see in mainland China (from what I'm told), and it is very nice and clean, but other than that, it's not a place I'd go to, except when the company has lunch there since I work nearby. The wait staff is unattentive.  Food items are quite expensive, especially considering the portions.  Dim sum is not particularly good.
Not bad for take-out but nothing was amazing. The black pepper beef was the best thing we ordered. However, nothing left us too impressed.
If you know your dim sum, you will be disappointed with Ming's.  It is meant mostly for non Chinese who do not know the difference.  Over priced and poor quality.  You are paying for the location.
This could be the worst Chinese food I have ever eaten.  I took a friend from Boston for lunch.  When we walked in there was a funny odor.   I should have been smart enough to walk out then but decided to overlook it.  Big mistake, the food had no taste, and when we asked for different sauces the waitress had an unhelpful attitude, like we we bothering her. PLEASE BELIEVE ME, avoid this place it was AWFUL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Went to Ming's earlier today - haven't been there for Dim Sum in about a year and a half - that time it was above average with a heafty price tag.  But that's what I expected from them.  Their Dim Sum today was below average.  They've changed their chef/recepie or something, but some of the the food was down right horrible.  It has always been a traditional Hong Kong style dim sum restaurant - but today it seemed like they hired a Shanghi trained chef and they 're lost between the two worlds.  The Shanghi Dumplings were flavorless and had no "soup" in the middle.  Traditional HK dishes like Siu Mai ad Haw Gao were bland and stale.  The portion sizes seem to be bigger, but so does the price. The good - steamed pork buns, larger than they use to have it (use to be bite sized), chicken feet, shrimp in long noodles (haw turng), egg custar cups. The bad - haw gao (fishy), siu mai (stale), Shanghi dumplings (just not right), Pot Sticers (who the heck came up with this new recipie?!), steamed egg custard buns (over cooked, not sweet). They added 18% gratuity on our check.  WTF?!  For ladies pushing carts around?  For 6 people our total bill was $110.  We stopped eating because we didn't want to gamble on getting another bad dish.
This restaurant is all about location and that is the only reason why it's still open. The food is overpriced and taste is overrated. I agree 100% with Gloria H. on her review. If you actually think this place is good then you haven't had good chinese food to compare to.
I've been here maybe 5-7 times. It's an average Americanized Chinese restaurant with an standard menu and so-so dim-sum lunches. BUT it's def worth trying out the Ming's Beef at least once.  Also the atmosphere is nice
Just got some ming's special chow fun and cantonese congee.  I liked it.  Lots of food, ok price.  Lots of variety.  Don't know about the restaurant becuase our company got food delivered.  Will enjoy again if I run into a Ming's.
Ming's has become my "go to" dim sum restaurant since I began working in Palo Alto several years ago. Though it can get very busy, especially between noon and 1:00 pm, I have always found the service to still be very prompt, and the servers and hosts are extremely friendly. Among my favorite dishes to order are the pork potstickers, shrimp dumplings, broccoli, vegetarian dumplings in spicy broth, congi soup (so good on cold winter days), shumai dumplings (pork and chicken), and the vegetable chow mein noodles. What I like best about Ming's is that the food and service are consistently good. I have dined at other dim sum restaurants on the peninsula and have had positive experiences the first time, only to return and be disappointed by poor service and poor quality in the food. That is never the case with Ming's--even during a hectic Friday lunch rush, the servers greet you with a smile and deliver fresh and delicious food to your table. I can't recommend this place enough!
I agree this place is overpriced. However, the chicken salad and pressed duck are excellent--best I've had anywhere--and definitely worth an occasional trip here.
Below average dim sum which survives because it doesn't have much competition in the area, and because the physical space is reasonably nice (i.e. not a hole in the wall) -- which is good for the Palo Alto and environs crowd. So if you find yourself in the Palo Alto area, want dim sum quickly and served reasonably efficiently, and aren't looking for anything special in a foodie sort of way, well then Ming is the place for you.  Otherwise, I'd recommend you pass.
We went here this morning for dim sum.  It was ok.  service was kind but not fast or efficient.  Food was ok, oily.  Very few/none veg. dim sum's.  This place is no comparison to Yank Sing in SF.  Felt a bit cheap, generic chinese.  And unforutnately, brought a out of town cousin here for 'really good' dim sum.
Hello, I am going to tell you my experience with this restaurant, during lunch time and a TOGO order. it might be different dining in but for sure taking out is BAD. First of all I never knew that the rice came with pickles or the Sch-wan beef did not have any vegetable, but they did add lots of lettuce? Don't know what that was about. I can honestly say that I have had better. anyway to my surprise my boss said it was good, so maybe I should of gotten what she ordered. I think the best part was that they charge if you want extra hot sauce although I had 3 orders for 3 different people, the cashier said that they can split the little container within. "LOL" is she serious, which part did she not understand about "IT IS FOR 3 DIFFERENT PEOPLE". Don't know, I am working on my Chinese and would love to be able to communicate being that I love Asian food. Anyway I am not saying don't eat there but defiantly reconsider. till then my food Friends enjoy the food and rate it.
Decent food. Definitely not the best. Not the best dim sum/not the best Chinese food place in the metro area. There has to be at least 2 dozens better in the Bay Area for dim sum. The food does not live up to the classy ambience that the restaurant exhibits. The dim sum could be better. Anyways, very spacious. Can hold lots of people definitely.
I visited on a Thursday night around 5:30 and despite the restaurant being fairly empty, I experienced very slow service. There was a 30 minute gap between our appetizer and our dinner. The food quality was below average, especially considering that we ordered Chinese food staples (pot stickers, hot and sour soup, chicken chow mein and Kung pow chicken). The  chicken was chewy and the chow mein had a weird flavor and was very dry. The soup was okay, but nothing special and not good enough to bring me back. Go to Hunan Garden on El Camino instead - So much better!
The kindest word that I can muster to describe the dim sum at Ming's is "unusual".  Unusual in the sense that the offerings are identical in name to various dishes typically found in the dim sum pantheon, and occasionally identical even in shape.  The taste, however... well, the taste is, how shall I say?  The taste is about 2383268792 kinds of wrong.  Seriously, this was the worst dim sum I have ever had in my life.  The BBQ pork buns were pale and doughy on the outside, and a wan, muddy brown pile of mush on the inside with barely a hint of actual char siu flavor.   The siu mai had a texture like a mouthful of tanned leather, as though they had been sitting out to dry in the desert sun for a few weeks.  Why I was insane enough to even attempt the lian rong buns after nothing else had been remotely edible is beyond me.  Morbid curiosity, perhaps.  Now these...these were the perverse piece de resistance of the whole affair.  Lian rong, or lotus paste, for the uninitiated, is normally a lovely, amber brown color, with a touch of translucency.   The abominations found at Ming's, on the other hand, were filled with some kind of paste that was opaque.  And GREEN.  It was like eating a giant abscess.  Not just based on looks--the flavor was all sorts of funky as well.  Honestly, the five or six things we'd ordered were so utterly inedible that we couldn't bring ourselves to order any more, so we asked for the check and were dealt the final blow: the bill came out to close to $30, including tax and tip...meaning these dishes were clocking in at $4 a pop or more.  We left feeling so ridiculously dissatisfied that we felt we had no choice but to immediately hie it to Milpitas and shove our faces full of actual, authentic, non-Staph-infection-like Chinese food.  If only we had done so in the first place.
We've been Ming's customers for over 30 years.  It's had it's highs and lows, it's back to it's LOW'S.  Our $125 worth of take-out was horrible, under cooked, small portions and prompted a phone call to David the manager.  We were invited in to be treated "well" to make up for it.  Our make up meal was good but we were presented with a bill upon finishing our "make up" meal.  David who ran Fung Lum into the ground has to be the cheapest China man I have met to date!  Do yourself a favor, save your money and go to Chef Chu's.
We love eating at Mings.  Went back for a recent weekday lunch. The food taste and food quantity was as good as ever. Parking is easy and just off the 101 Freeway. Prices are about $15 for a large meal.
We had another great time at Mings as guests for a friend's adult birthday party.  We have been to... Read more 
Like others have said, this place is pretty and conveniently located. But other than those two points, there's not much that can be positively said about the food. Tried the dim sum, and had lunch packed to-go another time. Typical greasy Chinese food, which would be okay if it was tastier. Might not come back, but I can see one of my bros holding his wedding reception here. So, I might come back, after all.
Just got back from a great time at Mings, this evening. As I promised the manager, I am going to give them a good review for good food and service. Prices are OK, but we had a wonderful time this evening chatting with friends and trying different dishes using a big lazy-susan to pass the food around.
We had a good experience last Saturday. The dinner was tasty (a pinch salty soup) and cook just right. Service is good and the restuarant is clean. Recommend.
I'd heard about this restaurant, and I think I'd even been here before, but when I went back recently....oh, it was awful!  The HarGow was tasteless.  The "cheung fun" with shrimp had the smallest shrimp ever.  The lotus leaf rice was also very bland.  And the fried sesame balls were mushy.  After ordering a few dishes, I just couldn't eat anymore because it was horrible.  I'll never ever go back.  This was the worst dim sum experience ever!
the food here is fresh and clean. all the dishes i've had were decent but their crispy duck with pancakes was my fav! this probably wouldn't be my first choice when i'm craving chinese due to it being on the pricier side and not as flavorful for my tastebuds BUT if you're planning to have a wedding or banquet with a 10 course meal and superb service - this is the place to have it! 4 stars because this place will forever hold a special place in my heart as we had our wedding reception here. our banquet manager, sophie, handled everything beautifully and really made our wedding day stress-free. they really are experts when it comes to planning and prepping for an event!
Will NEVER go back here after learning they serve Shark Fin Soup. Millions of Sharks die a brutal and senseless death every year for their fins. They are stripped of their fins and tossed back in the ocean to die:( So to Ming's of Palo Alto I "cut-off" my business to you and throw you out of my life. Take a stand and help to STOP SHARK FINNING!!!!
took a friend thee for lunch 3-17. the food was excellent as in the past. wait staff top notch i will be back. i am surprised at the other low reviews - that does not reflect my experiences.
I grew up in Palo Alto, and Mings was great.  This is why I was so sad to go there and find that it is now dirty, tired, and bad food.  I remember the dim sum and Chinese chicken salad being spectacular - both were embarrassingly bad.  I think that I heard that the owner changed hands, but if my experience is representative, don't go there.  the service was also quite horrible, rude, cold...  the place did not feel clean.
Our family has been going to Ming's for years and never had anything but great food and service. Never had a bad experience! The place is the largest Chinese restaurant I have ever been to and know of, it is always crowded which is always a good sign, you know the food is always fresh!  The prices are more than commensurate to a beautiful establishment, very impressive and clean! Ming's is always the first Chinese restaurant we think of when we get a craving for good Chinese food.
food is oookay... not great though. service is horrible, when they great you as you walk in, you feel a chill coming from the hostess. i think you can get much better chinese food definately at a better price as well.
I had my wedding reception there over a year ago.  The manager there was very nice and helped me with everything I needed.  He was very attentive and made sure my wedding reception ran smoothly!
wow, can dimsum be really this bad?
went there for friends celebration of life memorial, and it was quite yummy ,and the sweet and sour pork was good.
My family and I had a birthday dinner here for my wife, we sat down ordered or drinks and starters, the wait staff was on point we did notice the place was pretty empty but we have always had a great dining experience. We have had the dim sum and its the best this side of SF china town. For dinner we ordered the Mings chicken salad, honey walnut prawns and chow mien, wor won ton soup. While we waited, I asked the wait staff to buy a drink for the lady next to us how saw my daughters martini and asked for one so i payed for this Lady's drink. She accepted and we went on with our meal, the food was great. Well a few minuted into our dinner this Lady came by to thank us for the drink, we were all surprised to learn shes the owner. Nice and very warm we chatted for a few minutes and we parted ways. A few minutes later she presented us with a gift certificate. This was so nice for her we had a Great time and will be going back for dim sum.
Reading some of these reviews I almost thought to myself, did I go to the same Ming's? I've only been there once, so this review is for anyone considering Ming's for their wedding banquet. I went to Ming's last year for a wedding. There were 2 weddings going on and they are separated by the bar, which was nice; it didn't feel too intrusive like other places.  In the bar area, there was only one family eating dinner there and it was extremely dim. Our party was on the left side, which had windows that look out to the side of the parking lot.  Contrary to another reviewer, I thought the lot was tiny! I ended up parking in the corporate park area a block and a half away (and I wasn't even running late!). The staff were prompt for the most part in the beginning, but towards the end of the meal, it was hard to find them around, so I helped myself to getting our table more alcohol. The room layout is a little odd because it's not a perfect rectangle. There are a few tables toward the back of the room that are cut off from the main activity and while I had a good view of the slideshow, I didn't know if everyone did. There was no dance floor, but there was ample space for the check in table and cake.
kinda pricey but they have really good dim sum!
It's a crap shoot with Ming's.  The service is always lacking - you don't feel welcomed when you come in the restaurant.  Several times I've had to call back because no one answer the phone when you call to place an order.  Well I have went twice since my last review (this place is REALLY close to where I live), so I keep hoping the food will be good like the first time I went there.  Anyways no, the past two times were horrible and extremely over priced.  It was over $11 for an order of Sweet n Sour chicken...the chicken was very hard and crunchy and some pieces were unedible.  The chicken chowmein was very good this time though - like I said, crap shoot.  One time pot stickers were the best I'd ever had, the next two times I took a bite and tossed them.  Save your money and go to McDonald's right down the street - it's not Chinese, but it's not a complete rip off and the service is about as good.
Only had take out - the food isn't consistent, one time pot stickers were incredible, next time, I... Read more 
good place for a crowd, but the food is pretty bad.
I had my wedding reception at Ming's last year. Excellent location and convenient parking for those with guests from all over the Bay Area. The clincher for my husband and I was that they do allow outside beverages (read: bulk purchased alcohol)  to be served at the reception. The banquet manager, I believe his name was Ken was very pleasant to deal with, and I had no problems when I changed the reception date. Banquet food is typical Asian fare, and it came out hot & quickly. I did feel that I was harassed by some of the restaurant help on my wedding night (and in my very inebriated state) to pay the balance, which amounted to maybe $1K in cash. Would have been a much more pleasant experience if they had just allowed me settle the debt the next day, especially since I had already offered to pay in full the day before (!), but was told to wait because it might be "too much". Thank goodness my trusty bridesmaid was able to come up with the cash from the table toasting & other gifts. Overall a good, but not great experience.
Mings is my favorite Chinese restaurant on the peninsula. It is truly an authentic Chinese cuisine. I have tried almost all the dishes over the years and I must say they are all delicious. The chicken entrees and dim sum dish are my favorites.. A group of us ate their last Friday, the waiter answered all our questions so nicely.  We were impressed how quick the service is because the restaurant was full to the max.
